Ohio, session 136, HB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 101.63, 103.27, 1531.40, 1533.631, 1533.72, 1561.11, 1561.13, 1561.15, 1561.23, 1561.26, 1563.24, 1565.04, 1565.05, 1565.06, 3319.2213, 3319.51, 3701.83, 3704.14, 3748.01, 3748.04, 3748.11, 3748.13, 3748.16, 3773.31, 3773.33, 3773.34, 3773.35, 3773.36, 3773.37, 3773.38, 3773.39, 3773.40, 3773.41, 3773.42, 3773.421, 3773.43, 3773.45, 3773.51, 3773.52, 3773.53, 3773.54, 3773.55, 3773.56, 3773.57, 3773.59, 3776.05, 4730.10, 4730.14, 4731.294, 4759.08, 4764.05, 4764.08, 4771.02, 4771.05, 4771.07, 4771.08, 4771.09, 4771.10, 4771.11, 4771.12, 4771.13, 4771.14, 4771.16, 4771.18, 4771.21, 4771.22, 4771.23, 4774.03, 4774.06, and 4774.11 be amended and sections 3748.131 and 3773.341 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 101.63. (A)(1) Not later than the first day of March in the odd-numbered year during which an occupational licensing board is scheduled to be triggered to expire the following even-numbered year under section 101.62 of the Revised Code, the speaker of the house of representatives shall direct a standing committee of the house of representatives to hold hearings to receive the testimony of the public and of the chief executive officer of the board, and otherwise to review, consider, and evaluate the usefulness, performance, and effectiveness of the board. Not later than the fifteenth day of November of that same odd-numbered year, the standing committee shall prepare and publish a report of its findings and recommendations in accordance with section 101.65 of the Revised Code. If the standing committee's report includes a bill, the house of representatives shall consider that bill for passage by the thirty-first day of December of that same odd-numbered year. (2) Not later than the first day of March in the even-numbered year during which an occupational licensing board is scheduled to be triggered to expire under section 101.62 of the Revised Code, the president of the senate shall direct a standing committee of the senate to hold hearings to receive testimony of the public and of the chief executive officer of the board, and otherwise to review, consider, and evaluate the usefulness, performance, and effectiveness of the board and any bill considered by the house of representatives related to the expiration of that board. Not later than the fifteenth day of November of that same even-numbered year, the standing committee shall prepare and publish a report of its findings and recommendations in accordance with section 101.65 of the Revised Code. If the standing committee's report includes a bill, the senate shall consider that bill for passage by the thirty-first day of December of that same even-numbered year. (3) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives may, in the same manner as described in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section, direct a standing committee to review an occupational licensing board for which the director of the legislative service commission, under section 103.27 of the Revised Code, has performed a review. (4) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall direct standing committees to review approximately thirty-three per cent of the occupational licensing boards each biennium. All occupational licensing boards shall be reviewed over a six-year period including calendar years 2019 through 2024, and also during each subsequent six-year period. (B) Each occupational licensing board that is scheduled to be reviewed by a standing committee shall submit to the standing committee a report that contains all of the following information: (1) The board's primary purpose and its various goals and objectives; (2) The board's past and anticipated workload, the number of staff required to complete that workload, and the board's total number of staff; (3) The board's past and anticipated budgets and its sources of funding; (4) The number of members of its governing board or other governing entity and their compensation, if any, and any experience or other requirements an individual must meet to serve as a member of the governing board or entity. (C) Each board shall have the burden of demonstrating to the standing committee a public need for its continued existence. In determining whether a board has demonstrated that need, the standing committee shall consider, as relevant, all of the following: (1) Whether or not continuation of the board is necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the public, and if so, whether or not the board's authority is narrowly tailored to protect against present, recognizable, and significant harms to the health, safety, or welfare of the public; (2) Whether or not the public could be protected or served in an alternate or less restrictive manner; (3) Whether or not the board serves a specific private interest; (4) Whether or not rules adopted by the board are consistent with the legislative mandate of the board as expressed in the statutes that created and empowered the board; (5) The extent to which the board's jurisdiction and programs overlap or duplicate those of other boards, the extent to which the board coordinates with those other boards, and the extent to which the board's programs could be consolidated with the programs of other state departments or boards; (6) How many other states regulate the occupation, whether a license is required to engage in the occupation in other states, whether the initial licensing and license renewal requirements for the occupation are substantially equivalent in every state, and the amount of regulation exercised by the board compared to the regulation, if any, in other states; (7) The extent to which significant changes in the board's rules could prevent an individual licensed in this state from practicing, or allow an individual licensed in this state to practice, the same occupation in another jurisdiction without obtaining an occupational license for that occupation in that other jurisdiction; (8) Whether the board recognizes national uniform licensure requirements for the occupation; (9) Whether or not private contractors could be used, in an effective and efficient manner, either to assist the board in the performance of its duties or to perform these duties instead of the board; (10) Whether or not the operation of the board has inhibited economic growth, reduced efficiency, or increased the cost of government; (11) An assessment of the authority of the board regarding fees, inspections, enforcement, and penalties; (12) The extent to which the board has permitted qualified applicants to serve the public; (13) The extent to which the board has permitted individuals to practice elements of the occupation without a license; (14) The cost-effectiveness of the board in terms of number of employees, services rendered, and administrative costs incurred, both past and present; (15) Whether or not the board's operation has been impeded or enhanced by existing statutes and procedures and by budgetary, resource, and personnel practices; (16) Whether the board has recommended statutory changes to the general assembly that would benefit the public as opposed to the persons regulated by the board, if any, and whether its recommendations and other policies have been adopted and implemented; (17) Whether the board has required any persons it regulates to report to it the impact of board rules and decisions on the public as they affect service costs and service delivery; (18) Whether persons regulated by the board, if any, have been required to assess problems in their business operations that affect the public; (19) Whether the board has encouraged public participation in its rule-making and decision-making; (20) The efficiency with which formal public complaints filed with the board have been processed to completion; (21) Whether the purpose for which the board was created has been fulfilled, has changed, or no longer exists; (22) Whether federal law requires that the board be renewed in some form; (23) An assessment of the administrative hearing process of a board if the board has an administrative hearing process, and whether or not the hearing process is consistent with due process rights; (24) Whether the requirement for the occupational license is consistent with the policies expressed in section 4798.02 of the Revised Code, serves a meaningful, defined public interest, and provides the least restrictive form of regulation that adequately protects the public interest; (25) The extent to which licensing ensures that practitioners have occupational skill sets or competencies that are substantially related to protecting consumers from present, significant, and substantiated harms that threaten public health, safety, or welfare, and the impact that those criteria have on applicants for a license, particularly those with moderate or low incomes, seeking to enter the occupation or profession; (26) The extent to which the requirement for the occupational license stimulates or restricts competition, affects consumer choice, and affects the cost of services; (27) An assessment of whether or not changes are needed in the enabling laws of the board in order for it to comply with the criteria suggested by the considerations listed in division (C) of this section; (28) Beginning with reviews commencing on or after January 1, 2027, whether the number of board members is appropriate based on the board's workload and the number of occupational licenses issued by the board. For division (C) of this section, a government regulatory requirement protects or serves the public interest if it provides protection from present, significant, and substantiated harms to the health, safety, or welfare of the public. (D) The legislative service commission shall provide staff services to a standing committee performing its duties under this section and section 101.65 of the Revised Code. (E) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a standing committee tasked with the review of occupational licensing boards under this section may accept the report issued by the legislative service commission pursuant to section 103.27 of the Revised Code in the immediately preceding biennium in lieu of either of the following: (1) Receiving testimony from the chief executive officer of the board in accordance with division (A) of this section; (2) Requiring an occupational licensing board that is scheduled to be reviewed by a standing committee to submit to the standing committee a report in accordance with division (B) of this section. Sec. 103.27. (A) As used in this section, "personal qualification" has the same meaning as in section 101.62 of the Revised Code. (B) Each biennium starting with an odd-numbered year, beginning in 2019, the director of the legislative service commission shall issue a report regarding approximately thirty-three per cent of occupations subject to regulation by the state and, beginning with the biennium that starts in 2025, business licenses that require the applicant to satisfy a personal qualification. The report shall compare the current regulatory scheme being utilized in this state with the policies expressed in section 4798.02 of the Revised Code and, beginning with the biennium that starts in 2027, reflect the factors that the standing committees of the general assembly must consider under divisions (B) and (C) of section 101.63 of the Revised Code. (C) The director shall issue all reports performed during a biennium, not later than the first day of December of the even-numbered year of that biennium, to the general assembly and to the attorney general. (D) The director may require that information be submitted by any department or board that regulates the occupation. (E) Beginning with the biennium that starts in 2027, the director shall require that any department or board that regulates the occupation provide the following information to be included in the report: (1) Quantitative data on the following information, if applicable, for the period since the occupation was last reported on by the director: (a) The number of applicants; (b) Application approvals and denials; (c) New approvals; (d) Renewals, including approval of applicants who previously had approval to practice the occupation; (e) Data regarding discipline; (f) Revenue and costs; (g) Changes in revenue and costs since the occupation was last reported on by the director; (h) Changes in caseload since the occupation was last included in the report issued by the director. (2) An impact statement, including studies or data points, on any changes made to the occupation by the general assembly during the period since the occupation was last reported on by the director. The impact statement shall detail the impact of such a change on the board or department, the regulated occupation, and the public. (3) Additional documentation to support any response made to the director for inclusion in the report that is quantitative in nature, including responses related to fee structure and expenses of the department or board. (E)(F) The director shall, over a six-year period including calendar years 2019 through 2024, issue reports regarding all occupations subject to regulation by the state. Beginning with the biennium that starts in 2025, the director shall continue to issue reports regarding all occupations subject to regulation by the state, including business licenses that require the applicant to satisfy a personal qualification. (F)(G) A report required under division (B) of this section may be scheduled to coincide with, and be done in conjunction with, the review of an occupational licensing board being done by a standing committee of the general assembly under section 101.63 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1531.40. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Nuisance wild animal" means a wild animal that interferes with the use or enjoyment of property, is causing a threat to public safety, or may cause damage or harm to a structure, property, or person. (2) "Commercial nuisance wild animal control operatorcontroller" means an individual or business that who provides nuisance wild animal removal or control services for hire to the owner, the operator, or the owner's or operator's authorized agent of property or a structure. (B)(1) No person individual shall provide nuisance wild animal removal or control services for hire without obtaining a license under this section from the chief of the division of wildlife. (2) An applicant shall pay a license fee of forty twenty-five dollars for the license. The license shall be renewed annually prior to the first day of March and shall expire on the last day of Februaryevery three years. All money collected under this division shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the wildlife fund created in section 1531.17 of the Revised Code. (3) An individual who is providing nuisance wild animal removal or control services for hire under a license issued under this section is exempt from obtaining a hunting license under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code, a fur taker permit under section 1533.111 of the Revised Code, or a fishing license under section 1533.32 of the Revised Code for the purposes of performing those services. (4) An individual who is employed by the state, a county, or a municipal corporation and who performs nuisance wild animal removal or control services on land that is owned by the state, county, or municipal corporation, as applicable, as part of the individual's employment is exempt from obtaining a license under this section. (C)(1)(C) Unless otherwise specified by division rule, a commercial nuisance wild animal control operator and any individual who is employed by an operator controller that is engaged in activities that are part of or related to the removal or control of nuisance wild animals, including setting or maintaining traps, shall obtain a certification of completion of a course of instruction that complies with rules adopted under division (F)(E) of this section. A certification shall be renewed every three years. (2) Except as provided in division (H) of this section, an individual who provides nuisance wild animal removal or control services under a license issued under this section shall comply with division (C)(1) of this section. (D) An operator that holds a license issued under this section is responsible for the acts of each of the operator's employees in the removal or control of a nuisance wild animal. (E) If an individual who is licensed under this section uses a pesticide in the removal or control of a nuisance wild animal, the individual shall obtain the appropriate license under Chapter 921. of the Revised Code. (F)(E) Except as provided in division (H)(G) of this section, the chief shall adopt rules under section 1531.10 of the Revised Code establishing all of the following: (1) Appropriate methods for trapping, capturing, removing, relocating, and controlling nuisance wild animals by operators controllers licensed under this section; (2) Procedures for issuing, denying, suspending, and revoking a license under this section; (3) Requirements governing the certification course required by division (C)(1)(C) of this section. The rules shall specify the minimum contents of such a course, including public safety and health, animal life history, the use of nuisance wild animal removal and control devices, and the laws and rules governing those activities. The rules also shall specify who may conduct such a course. The rules shall require that, in order for an operator a controller to receive a certification of completion, the operator controller shall pass an examination. The rules shall require the course to be provided via the internet and shall not require a fee for completion of the course or taking the examination. (4) Any other requirements and procedures necessary to administer and enforce this section. Rules shall be adopted under division (F)(E) of this section only with the approval of the director of natural resources. (G)(F) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and with rules adopted under this section, the chief may suspend or revoke a license issued under this section if the chief finds that the holder of the license is violating or has violated this chapter, Chapter 1533. of the Revised Code, or rules adopted under those chapters. (H)(G) The chief shall issue a license to provide nuisance wild animal removal or control services in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as an individual who provides nuisance wild animal removal or control services in a state that does not issue that license. Sec. 1533.631. Any person may apply for a permit to handle commercial fish, or other fish that may be bought or sold under the Revised Code or division rule, at wholesale. Prior to making application for such a permit, a person first shall satisfy the following qualifications to the satisfaction of the chief of the division of wildlife: over eighteen years of age, no prior conviction of or plea of guilty on or after October 10, 2007, to a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code, and ninety days Ohio residency immediately preceding application. The chief shall issue an annual permit granting the applicant the privilege to handle such fish at wholesale at one or more designated premises upon satisfaction of the pre-application qualifications, filing of an application on a form prescribed by the chief, and payment of a fee of sixty-five fifty dollars. No person or a person's agent shall handle at wholesale any fresh water fish or part thereof unless a permit has been issued for the calendar year in which the fish is handled at wholesale for the premises at which the fish is handled. A fish is handled at wholesale for purposes of this section when it is on a premises within the state and is being held, stored, handled, or processed for the purpose of sale to a person who resells the fish. The permit required by this section shall be issued subject to the right of entry and inspection of the designated premises of the permittee by any law enforcement officer authorized by section 1531.13 of the Revised Code to enforce the laws and rules of the division of wildlife. Such an officer may enter and inspect the designated premises and any box, package, or receptacle, and the contents thereof, for the purpose of determining whether any provision of this chapter or Chapter 1531. of the Revised Code or division rule is being violated. No person holding a permit under this section shall remove a label required by section 1533.301 of the Revised Code unless the box, package, or receptacle bearing the label has been opened or unless the label is replaced with another label that meets the requirements of that section. No person shall fail to comply with any provision of this section or division rule adopted pursuant to it. Sec. 1533.72. (A) No person shall own or operate a commercial bird shooting preserve without a license issued by the chief of the division of wildlife under this section. (B) Application for a commercial bird shooting preserve license shall be made on a form prescribed by the chief and shall be accompanied by an annual license fee of two one hundred fifty dollars. The application shall contain a list of which species of game birds are to be released for hunting in the preserve, a description of the lands that are to constitute the preserve, a description of the tag and symbol identifying the preserve required under division (D) of section 1533.73 of the Revised Code, and any other information required by the chief. (C) The chief, upon payment of the license fee, may issue to the applicant a commercial bird shooting preserve license if all of the following conditions are met: (1) The operation of the commercial bird shooting preserve does not conflict with a prior reasonable public interest; (2) The proposed commercial bird shooting preserve meets the requirements established in division (A) of section 1533.73 of the Revised Code; (3) The applicant is the owner or lessee of the land described in the application and maintains histhat status as the owner or lessee of the land until the license expires; (4) The applicant produces evidence satisfactory to the chief that hethe applicant will comply with division (E) of section 1533.73 of the Revised Code. (D) All licenses issued under this section shall expire on the thirtieth day of April of each year. Any license holder wishing to own or operate a commercial bird shooting preserve in the year following the expiration of histhe license shall apply for a new license under division (B) of this section. (E) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the chief may suspend or revoke a commercial bird shooting preserve license if hethe chief finds that the license holder has violated or is violating this chapter ofor Chapter 1531. of the Revised Code or any division rule. Sec. 1561.11. The chief of the division of mineral resources management, for the purpose of conducting the examinations for mine forepersons and fire bosses, may designate one or more examining boards of three members, selected from among the deputy mine inspectors, superintendent and assistant superintendents of rescue stations, and electrical inspectors. The examinations shall be conducted in the district of the applicant's residence or as near thereto as practicable. Grading and issuance of certificates shall be done by the chief. Sec. 1561.13. The chief of the division of mineral resources management shall conduct examinations for offices and positions in the division of mineral resources management, and for mine forepersons, mine electricians, and surface mine blasters, as follows: (A) Division of mineral resources management: (1) Deputy mine inspectors of underground mines; (2) Deputy mine inspectors of surface mines; (3) Electrical inspectors; (4) Superintendent of rescue stations; (5) Assistant superintendents of rescue stations; (6) Mine chemists at a division laboratory if the chief chooses to operate a laboratory. (B) Mine forepersons: (1) Mine foreperson of gaseous mines; (2) Mine foreperson of nongaseous mines; (3) Mine foreperson of surface mines. (C) Forepersons: (1) Foreperson of gaseous mines; (2) Foreperson of nongaseous mines; (3) Foreperson of surface mines. (D) Mine electricians. (E) Surface mine blasters. The chief annually shall provide for the examination of candidates for appointment or promotion as deputy mine inspectors and such other positions and offices set forth in division (A) of this section as are necessary. Special examinations may be held whenever it becomes necessary to make appointments to any of those positions. The chief shall provide for the examination of persons seeking certificates of competency as mine forepersons, forepersons, mine electricians, and surface mine blasters as needed and at such times and places within the state as shall, in the judgment of the chief, afford the best facilities to the greatest number of applicants. The examinations provided for in this section shall be conducted under rules adopted under section 1561.05 of the Revised Code and conditions prescribed by the chief. Any rules that relate to particular candidates shall, upon application of any candidate, be furnished to the candidate by the chief; they shall also be of uniform application to all candidates in the several groups. Sec. 1561.15. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a certificate as mine foreperson, foreperson, mine electrician, shot firer, or surface mine blaster, or fire boss shall apply to the chief of the division of mineral resources management for examination and shall be examined by the chief. This shall be a practical examination, a substantial part of which shall be oral, to determine the competency of the applicant, based on experience and practical knowledge of the dangers incident to coal mining, and not upon technical education, but consideration shall be given such technical education as the applicant possesses. This examination shall be held as soon after application is made as practicable in the district from which the applicant makes application. (B) The chief may require an applicant for a certificate as mine foreperson, foreperson, mine electrician, shot firer, or surface mine blaster, or fire boss to pass an examination in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. Sec. 1561.23. (A) The chief of the division of mineral resources management shall issue the following certificates to those applicants who pass their examination: (1) Certificates for mine forepersons of gaseous mines; (2) Certificates for mine forepersons of nongaseous mines; (3) Certificates for forepersons of gaseous mines; (4) Certificates for forepersons of nongaseous mines; (5) (3) Certificates for mine forepersons of surface mines; (6)(4) Certificates for forepersons of surface mines; (7)(5) Certificates for mine electricians; (8)(6) Certificates for surface mine blasters. (B) Applicants for certificates shall make application to the chief, on a form provided by the chief, for examination. All applicants shall be able to read and write the English language intelligently, and shall furnish the chief with a certificate as to the length and description of their practical experience and satisfactory evidence of their ability to perform the duties of the position for which they make application for examination. (C) The chief may issue a certificate to an applicant for mine foreperson, foreperson, or mine electrician who holds a valid certification or other authorization from a state with which the department of natural resources has a reciprocal agreement for the certification or other authorization. However, the applicant shall pass an examination on this chapter and rules adopted under it or on any other relevant material that the chief determines to be appropriate. A mine foreperson, foreperson, or mine electrician who has been issued a temporary certificate under section 1565.06 of the Revised Code prior to September 30, 2021, and who holds a valid certification or other authorization from a state with which the department has a reciprocal agreement for the certification or other authorization may continue to operate under the temporary certificate until it expires or the chief suspends or revokes it. (D) Except as provided in sections 1561.16 and 1561.17 of the Revised Code, any certificate issued by the former mine examining board prior to October 29, 1995, shall remain in effect notwithstanding the new classifications of certificates established by this section. Sec. 1561.26. (A) As used in this section: (1) "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," and "paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Mine medical responder" has the same meaning as in section 1565.15 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent of rescue stations, with the approval of the chief of the division of mineral resources management, shall, at each rescue station provided for in section 1561.25 of the Revised Code, train and employ rescue crews of six members each, one of whom shall hold a mine foreperson or fire boss certificate and be designated captain, and train and employ any number of such rescue crews as the superintendent believes necessary. One member of a rescue crew shall be certified as an EMT-basic, EMT-I, mine medical responder, or paramedic. Each member of a rescue crew shall devote the time specified by the chief each month for training purposes and shall be available at all times to assist in rescue work at explosions, mine fires, and other emergencies. A captain of mine rescue crews shall receive for service as captain the sum of twenty-four dollars per month, and each member shall receive the sum of twenty dollars per month, all payable on requisition approved by the chief. When engaged in rescue work at explosions, mine fires, or other emergencies away from their station, the members of the rescue crews and captains of the same shall be paid the sum of six dollars per hour for work on the surface, which includes the time consumed by those members in traveling to and from the scene of the emergency when the scene is away from the station of the members, and the sum of seven dollars per hour for all work underground at the emergency, and in addition thereto, the necessary living expenses of the members when the emergency is away from their home station, all payable on requisition approved by the chief. Each member of a mine rescue crew shall undergo an annual medical examination. The chief may designate to perform an examination any individual authorized by the Revised Code to do so, including a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, a certified nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife. In designating the individual to perform a medical examination, the chief shall choose one near the station of the member of the rescue crews. The examiner shall report the examination results to the chief and if, in the opinion of the chief, the report indicates that the member is physically unfit for further services, the chief shall relieve the member from further duty. The fee charged by the examiner for the examination shall be paid in the same manner as fees are paid to doctors employed by the industrial commission for special medical examinations. The chief may remove any member of a rescue crew for any reason. Such crews shall be subject to the orders of the chief, the superintendent, and the deputy mine inspectors when engaged in actual mine rescue work. Mine rescue crews shall, in case of death or injury when engaged in rescue work, wherever the same may occur, be paid compensation, or their dependents shall be paid death benefits, from the workers' compensation fund, in the same manner as other employees of the state. (C) In addition to the training of rescue crews, each assistant superintendent of rescue stations, with the approval of the superintendent, shall provide for and conduct safety, first aid, and rescue classes at any mine or for any group of miners who make application for the conducting of such classes. The chief may assess a fee for safety and first aid classes for the purpose of covering the costs associated with providing those classes. The chief shall establish a fee schedule for safety and first aid classes by rule adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the mining regulation and safety fund created in section 1513.30 of the Revised Code. The superintendent shall prescribe and provide for a uniform schedule of conducting such safety and rescue classes as will provide a competent knowledge of modern safety and rescue methods in, at, and about mines. (D) No member of a mine rescue crew who performs mine rescue at an underground coal mine and no operator of a mine whose employee participates as a member of such a mine rescue crew is liable in any civil action that arises under the laws of this state for damage or injury caused in the performance of rescue work at an underground coal mine. However, a member of such a mine rescue crew may be liable if the member acted with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. This division does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any immunity from civil liability that is conferred on a member of such a mine rescue crew or an operator by any other provision of the Revised Code or by case law. Sec. 1563.24. In all mines generating methane in such quantities as to be considered a gaseous mine under section 1563.02 of the Revised Code, the mine foreperson of such a mine shall: (A) Employ a sufficient number of competent persons holding foreperson of gaseous mines or fire boss certificates, except as provided in section 1565.02 of the Revised Code, to examine the working places whether they are in actual course of working or not, and the traveling ways and entrances to old workings with approved flame safety lamps, all of which shall be done not more than three hours prior to the time fixed for the employees to enter the mine; (B) Have all old parts of the mine not in the actual course of working, but that are open and safe to travel, examined not less than once each three days by a competent person who holds a foreperson of gaseous mines or a fire boss certificate; (C) See that all parts of the mine not sealed off as provided in section 1563.41 of the Revised Code are kept free from standing gas, and upon the discovery of any standing gas, see that the entrance to the place where the gas is so discovered is fenced off and marked with a sign upon which is written the word "danger," and the sign shall so remain until the gas has been removed; (D) Have the mine examined on all idle days, holidays, and Sundays on which employees are required to work therein; (E) If more than three hours elapse between shifts, have the places in which the succeeding shift works examined by a competent person who holds a foreperson of gaseous mines or fire boss certificate; (F) See that this chapter and Chapters 1561., 1565., and 1567. and applicable provisions of Chapter 1509. of the Revised Code, with regard to examination of working places, removal of standing gas, and fencing off of dangerous places, are complied with before the employees employed by the mine foreperson for this particular work are permitted to do any other work; (G) Have a report made on the blackboard provided for in section 1567.06 of the Revised Code, which report shall show the condition of the mine as to the presence of gas and the place where such gas is present, if there is any, before the mine foreperson permits the employees to enter the mine; (H) Have reports of the duties and activities enumerated in this section signed by the person who makes the examination. The reports so signed shall be sent once each week to the deputy mine inspector of the district in which the mine is located on blanks furnished by the division of mineral resources management for that purpose, and a copy of the report shall be kept on file at the mine. (I) Have the fire boss record a report after each examination, in ink, in the fire boss' record book, which book shall show the time taken in making the examination and also clearly state the nature and location of any danger that was discovered in any room, entry, or other place in the mine, and, if any danger was discovered, the fire boss shall immediately report the location thereof to the mine foreperson. No person shall enter the mine until the fire bosses return to the mine office on the surface, or to a station located in the mine, where a record book as provided for in this section shall be kept and signed by the person making the examination, and report to the oncoming mine foreperson that the mine is in safe condition for the employees to enter. When a station is located in any mine, the fire bosses shall sign also the report entered in the record book in the mine office on the surface. The record books of the fire bosses shall at all times during working hours be accessible to the deputy mine inspector and the employees of the mine. In every mine generating explosive gas in quantities sufficient to be detected by an approved flame safety lamp, when the working portions are one mile or more from the entrance to the mine or from the bottom of the shaft or slope, a permanent station of suitable dimensions may be erected by the mine foreperson, provided that the location is approved by the deputy mine inspector, for the use of the fire bosses, and a fireproof vault of ample strength shall be erected in the station of brick, stone, or concrete, in which the temporary record book of the fire bosses, as described in this section, shall be kept. No person, except a mine foreperson of gaseous mines, and in case of necessity such other persons as are designated by the mine foreperson, shall pass beyond the permanent station and danger signal until the mine has been examined by a fire boss, and the mine or certain portions thereof reported by the fire boss to be safe. This section does not prevent a mine foreperson or foreperson of gaseous mines from being qualified to act and acting in the capacity of fire boss. The record book shall be supplied by the division and purchased by the operator. No mine foreperson or person delegated by the mine foreperson, or any operator of a mine, or other person, shall refuse or neglect to comply with this section. Sec. 1565.04. The operator of each mine who is an employer as defined in section 4123.01 of the Revised Code, or any mine with three or more workers, shall employ a certified mine foreperson. In gaseous underground mines, only a holder of a mine foreperson of gaseous mines certificate that contains a notation by the chief of the division of mineral resources management showing the holder to be at least twenty-three years of age and have at least five years' actual practical experience in gaseous mines shall be employed as the mine foreperson. In other underground mines, the mine foreperson shall be a holder of a mine foreperson of nongaseous mines certificate that contains a notation by the chief showing the holder to be at least twenty-one years of age and have at least three years' actual practical experience in mines. All such underground mines shall have at least one certified foreperson on duty at all times when workers are employed in the loading or mining of coal underground. Each active working area of a surface coal mine and each active surface installation of an underground coal mine shall be examined for hazardous conditions, at least once during each working shift or more often if necessary for safety, by a certified mine foreperson who is designated by the operator to conduct such examinations. Any hazardous conditions noted during the examinations shall be reported to the operator and shall be corrected by the operator. A certified mine foreperson may conduct the examination that is required during each shift at multiple mine sites, provided that the sites are within a ten-mile radius. No operator of a mine shall refuse or neglect to comply with this section. Sec. 1565.05. The operator of a mine shall keep on file a copy of the certificate of each mine foreperson, and foreperson, and fire boss in the operator's employ or under the operator's control. Such certificate shall be exhibited to the chief of the division of mineral resources management, or any deputy mine inspector, upon demand. No operator of a mine shall refuse or neglect to comply with this section. Sec. 1565.06. (A) In emergencies arising at a mine because of accident, death, illness, or any other cause, an operator may appoint noncertificate persons as forepersons and fire bosses to act until certified forepersons and fire bosses satisfactory to the operator can be secured. Such appointee may not serve in such capacity for a period longer than six months or until such time thereafter as an examination is held for such certified persons under section 1561.13 of the Revised Code. The employer of such noncertificate person shall, upon appointment of such noncertificate person in this capacity, forward the name of such noncertificate person to the chief of the division of mineral resources management. (B) An operator may appoint as a temporary foreperson or fire boss a noncertificate person who is within six months of possessing the necessary actual practical experience to qualify to take the examination for certification for the position to which the person is temporarily appointed. Upon appointment of a noncertificate person, the operator shall forward the name, social security number, and brief summary of the person's actual practical experience to the chief, and the chief shall issue the person a temporary certificate for the position to which the person has been temporarily appointed. A temporary certificate issued under this division is valid for six months or until such time thereafter as an examination is held under section 1561.13 of the Revised Code for the position to which the person has been temporarily appointed. (C) A nonresident person who possesses a valid certificate issued by another state for a position for which the chief issues a certificate shall be eligible for a temporary certificate from the chief upon presentation to the chief of a copy of the certificate from that other state. Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code does not apply to a certificate issued under this section. A temporary certificate issued under this division shall be valid for six months. No operator of a mine shall violate or fail to comply with this section. Sec. 3319.2213. (A) The state board of education shall enter into an agreement with a construction trade organization located in this state, such as affiliated construction trades (ACT) Ohio, or its successor organization, to develop a training program to educate school counselors about building and construction trades career pathways. A training program developed under this section shall be completed at a building and construction trades training facility and include information about both of the following: (1) The pay and benefits available to people who work in the building and construction trades; (2) Job opportunities and available apprenticeships for boilermakers, electrical workers, bricklayers, insulators, laborers, iron workers, plumbers and pipefitters, roofers, plasterers and cement masons, sheet metal workers, painters and glazers, elevator constructors, operating engineers, carpenters, and teamsters. (B)(1)(B) A licensed school counselor serving students in any of grades seven through twelve shall complete four hours of training developed under division (A) of this section every five yearswithin five years of initial licensure or, for such a counselor who was licensed prior to the effective date of this amendment, within five years of that effective date. (C) Within five years of completing an initial training under division (B) of this section, and every five years thereafter, a licensed school counselor serving students in any of grades seven through twelve shall either complete four hours of training developed under division (A) of this section or certify to the local professional development committee established under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code that the counselor has spent a minimum of four hours doing one or more of the following alternative activities: (1) Touring local career-technical education facilities and investigating program offerings, as well as possible student apprenticeship, internship, and employment opportunities for each program; (2) Meeting with local JobsOhio staff and reviewing local business needs; in-demand job fields; and apprenticeship, internship, and employment opportunities for each local in-demand field; (3) Participating in or helping host a career exploration opportunity for students with local businesses, including local employers of in-demand jobs. This training (D) Training and alternative activities completed under this section shall qualify toward meeting professional development activity requirements for the renewal of a pupil services license in school counseling. An individual who begins working with students in any of grades seven through twelve in the last two years of the individual's five-year renewal cycle shall complete this requirement during the following license renewal cycle. (2) Local professional development committees established under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall incorporate this such training and alternative activities as part of the independent professional development programs for school counselors that serve students in any of grades seven through twelve. (C)(E) Participating building and construction trades shall ensure ample opportunities for school counselors to complete the training prescribed under described in division (A) of this section during each renewal cycle for licensure. Participating building and construction trades training facilities or the entity with which the state board enters into an agreement under this section shall bear all costs associated with this that training. Sec. 3319.51. (A) As used in this section, "operating expenses" includes the cost of administering requirements related to the issuance and renewal of licenses, certificates, or permits described in this chapter and sections 3301.071 and 3301.074 of the Revised Code and any other cost incurred by the state board of education to perform a duty prescribed by law. (B) The state board of education shall annually establish the amount of the fees required to be paid for any license, certificate, or permit issued under this chapter or division (B) of section 3301.071 or section 3301.074 of the Revised Code. Except The state board shall establish a fee of one hundred fifty dollars to obtain or renew a professional administrator license issued under section 3319.272 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (C) of this section, the amount of these fees shall be such that they, along with any appropriation made by the general assembly, will be sufficient to cover the annual estimated operating expenses of the state board. (C) The state board shall not require any fee to be paid under division (B) of this section for a license, certificate, or permit issued for the purpose of teaching in a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code. (D) The operating expenses of the state board shall be paid primarily from, and all license, certificate, or permit fees received by the state board shall be deposited in, the state treasury to the credit of the occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3701.83. There is hereby created in the state treasury the general operations fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used for the purposes specified in sections 3701.04, 3701.344, 3711.16, 3717.45, 3718.06, 3721.02, 3721.022, 3729.07, 3733.43, 3748.04, 3748.05, 3748.07, 3748.12, 3748.13, 3749.04, 3749.07, 3776.08, and 4769.09 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3704.14. (A)(1) If the director of environmental protection determines that implementation of a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is necessary for the state to effectively comply with the federal Clean Air Act after June 30, 2025, the director may provide for the implementation of the program in those counties in this state in which such a program is federally mandated. Upon making such a determination, the director of environmental protection may request the director of administrative services to extend the terms of the contract that was entered into under the authority of H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly. Upon receiving the request, the director of administrative services shall extend the contract, beginning on July 1, 2025, in accordance with this section. The contract shall be extended for a period of up to twenty-four months with the contractor who conducted the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program under that contract. (2) Prior to the expiration of the contract extension that was authorized by division (A)(1) of this section under the authority of H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly, the director of environmental protection shall request the director of administrative services to enter into a contract with a vendor to operate a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program in each county in this state in which such a program is federally mandated through June 30, 2027. The contract shall ensure that the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program achieves an equivalent amount of emission reductions as achieved by the program operated under the authority of the contract that was extended under division (A)(1) of this section under the authority of H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly. The director of administrative services shall select a vendor through a competitive selection process in compliance with Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. (3) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of administrative services shall ensure that a competitive selection process regarding a contract to operate a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program in this state incorporates the following, which shall be included in the contract: (a) For purposes of expanding the number of testing locations for consumer convenience, a requirement that the vendor utilize established local businesses, auto repair facilities, or leased properties to operate state-approved inspection and maintenance testing facilities; (b) A requirement that the vendor selected to operate the program provide notification of the program's requirements to each owner of a motor vehicle that is required to be inspected under the program. The contract shall require the notification to be provided not later than sixty days prior to the date by which the owner of the motor vehicle is required to have the motor vehicle inspected. The director of environmental protection and the vendor shall jointly agree on the content of the notice. However, the notice shall include at a minimum the locations of all inspection facilities within a specified distance of the address that is listed on the owner's motor vehicle registration. (c) A requirement that the vendor comply with testing methodology and supply the required equipment approved by the director of environmental protection as specified in the competitive selection process in compliance with Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. (4) A decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program operated under this section shall comply with division (B) of this section. The director of environmental protection shall administer the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program operated under this section. (B) The director shall establish a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program as authorized by this section and, at a minimum, the director shall ensure that the program does all of the following: (1) Complies with the federal Clean Air Act; (2) Provides for the issuance of inspection certificates and alternative emissions certificates as specified in rules adopted under division (C)(2) of this section; (3) Provides for a new car exemption for motor vehicles six years old or newer and provides that a new motor vehicle is exempt for six years regardless of whether legal title to the motor vehicle is transferred during that period; (4) Provides for an exemption for battery electric motor vehicles; (5) Provides for an exemption for hybrid motor vehicles seven years old or newer and provides that a hybrid motor vehicle is exempt for seven years regardless of whether legal title to the motor vehicle is transferred during that period. (C)(1) The director of environmental protection shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that the director determines are necessary to implement this section. The director may continue to implement and enforce rules pertaining to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program previously implemented under former section 3704.14 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to its repeal and reenactment by Am. Sub. H.B. 66 of the 126th general assembly, provided that the rules do not conflict with this section. (2) The rules adopted under division (C)(1) of this section shall provide for the issuance of inspections certificates and alternative emissions certificates. Under the rules, an inspection certificate shall be issued to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle when the motor vehicle passes an emissions inspection conducted in accordance with the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under this section. In lieu of obtaining an inspection certificate, the rules shall establish a system by which the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may request an alternative emissions certificate from the director. (a) The rules providing for the issuance of alternative emissions certificates shall require an owner or lessee of a motor vehicle to do the following in order to receive the certificate: (i) Complete and submit an attestation form created by the director that includes a statement that reads substantially as follows: "I, _______, attest that, to the best of my knowledge, the motor vehicle concerning which I am the owner or lessee complies with all laws of Ohio and the United States governing motor vehicle emissions. I, ______, am aware that a false statement on this form is not permitted." (ii) Sign and date the form either manually or electronically; (iii) Submit the form to the director either by regular mail, certified mail, or electronically. (b) The rules shall require the director to include both of the following additional information on the attestation form: (i) A provision that allows the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle to specify one of the following methods by which the owner or lessee may request delivery of the alternative emissions certificate: certified mail, noncertified mail, or electronically; (ii) A provision that allows the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle to specify the vehicle identification number, make, model, and year of the relevant motor vehicle and the date the attestation form is submitted to the director. (c) Subject to division (C)(2)(d) of this section, the rules shall require the director to deliver an alternative emission certificate to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who complies with rules adopted under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. The director shall deliver the certificate within thirty business days after the director's receipt of the attestation form or, if the owner or lessee submits the form electronically, within five business days after receipt of the form. The director shall confirm the receipt of the attestation form if the director receives it by electronic means. (d) The rules shall require the director to reject an attestation form for any of the following reasons: (i) The motor vehicle that is the subject of the attestation form was in an accident or collision within the two years prior to the date of submission of the form, and the accident or collision caused substantial damage to the internal structure of the motor vehicle. (ii) The owner or lessee of the motor vehicle that is the subject of the attestation form has received a ticket, citation, or summons with regard to that motor vehicle within the two years prior to the date of submission of the form for a violation of section 4513.22 of the Revised Code or substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (iii) The information in the attestation form is determined by the director to be false. If the director rejects an attestation form under division (C)(2)(d)(iii) of this section, the director shall provide notice to the owner or lessee that the attestation form was determined to be false. The notice shall inform the owner or lessee that the owner or lessee may submit a corrected form to the director within thirty days of the receipt of the notice. If the owner or lessee submits a corrected attestation form that complies with rules adopted under division (C)(2) of this section within that thirty-day period, the director shall issue an alternative emissions certificate to the owner or lessee. If the owner or lessee fails to correct the attestation form, the director shall require the owner or lessee to complete an emissions inspection and obtain an inspection certificate in accordance with rules adopted under this section. If the director rejects an attestation form under division (C)(2)(d)(i) or (ii) of this section, the director shall require the owner or lessee to complete an emissions inspection and obtain an inspection certificate in accordance with rules adopted under this section. (e) In adopting rules under division (C)(2) of this section, the director shall ensure that the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who falsifies an attestation form receives a notice that includes a statement that reads substantially as follows: "You have falsified an attestation form for your vehicle under the E-Check/motor vehicle emissions testing program. Your vehicle is registered in one of [insert the number of counties] counties in this state that has federal emission mandates imposed on it that the State of Ohio is required, under threat of penalty, to enforce. This letter serves as Ohio's only penalty for falsification of an attestation form. You have thirty days from the date of this notice to amend your attestation form and submit the amended form to the Environmental Protection Agency. However, if you choose not to submit an amended attestation form, you must have a motor vehicle emissions inspection conducted for your vehicle in accordance with section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it." (f) No penalties apply to a person who the director has determined to have falsified an attestation form, other than the issuance of the notice required under division (C)(2)(e) of this section. (D) There is hereby created in the state treasury the auto emissions test fund, which shall consist of money received by the director from any cash transfers, state and local grants, and other contributions that are received for the purpose of funding the program established under this section. The director of environmental protection shall use money in the fund solely for the implementation, supervision, administration, operation, and enforcement of the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under this section. Money in the fund shall not be used for either of the following: (1) To pay for the inspection costs incurred by a motor vehicle dealer so that the dealer may provide inspection certificates to an individual purchasing a motor vehicle from the dealer when that individual resides in a county that is subject to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program; (2) To provide payment for more than one free passing emissions inspection or a total of three emissions inspections for a motor vehicle in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day period. The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is responsible for inspection fees that are related to emissions inspections beyond one free passing emissions inspection or three total emissions inspections in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day period. Inspection fees that are charged by a contractor conducting emissions inspections under a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program shall be approved by the director of environmental protection. (E) The motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under this section expires upon the termination of all contracts entered into under this section and shall not be implemented beyond the final date on which termination occurs. (F) As used in this section "battery electric motor vehicle" and "hybrid motor vehicle" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (G) On June 30, 2025, the director shall immediately begin procedures to submit to the United States environmental protection agency the alternative emissions certification program for approval as part of the Ohio state implementation plan. If the United States environmental protection agency approves the modification of the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program as providing sufficient air pollution reductions to meet the federal Clean Air Act requirements for a vehicle inspection and maintenance program and modifies the Ohio state implementation plan, the director shall immediately begin to modify the Ohio environmental protection agency rules to implement the alternative emissions certification program. Nothing in this division requires the Ohio environmental protection agency to take action to implement the alternative emissions certification program until the United States environmental protection agency approves the alternative program as part of the Ohio state implementation plan. (H) If the United States environmental protection agency determines that the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program implemented in accordance with this section is not necessary for the state or any area of the state to comply with the federal Clean Air Act, the director shall immediately discontinue the program and take any actions necessary to effectuate the termination of the program. If the director discontinues the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program in this state in accordance with this division, the director shall immediately rescind any rule associated with the program, including rules that govern both of the following: (1) The certification of inspectors under the program; (2) The certification of repair technicians, including waiver repair technicians, under the program. Sec. 3748.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Byproduct material" means either of the following: (1) Any radioactive material, except special nuclear material, yielded in or made radioactive by exposure to radiation incident to the process of producing or utilizing special nuclear material; (2) The tailings or wastes produced by the extraction or concentration of uranium or thorium from any ore processed primarily for its source material content. (B) "Certified radiation expert" means an individual who has complied with all of the following: (1) Applied to the director of health for certification as a radiation expert under section 3748.12 of the Revised Code; (2) Met minimum education and experience requirements established in rules adopted under division (C) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code; (3) Been granted a certificate as a radiation expert by the director under section 3748.12 of the Revised Codedevelops, provides periodic review of, and conducts audits of a quality assurance program. (C) "Closure" or "site closure" refers to a facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste or a byproduct material site, as "byproduct material" is defined in division (A)(2) of this section, and means all activities performed at a licensed operation, such as stabilization and contouring, to ensure that the site where the operation occurred is in a stable condition so that only minor custodial care, surveillance, and monitoring are necessary at the site following the termination of the licensed operation. (D) "Decommissioning" means to safely remove any licensed operation from service and reduce residual radioactivity to a level that permits release of the licensee's property for unrestricted use. With regard to a facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste or a byproduct material site, as "byproduct material" is defined in division (A)(2) of this section, "decommissioning" does not include the reduction of residual radioactivity to a level that permits release of the facility for unrestricted use. (E) "Director of health" includes a designee or authorized representative of the director. (F) "Disposal," with regard to low-level radioactive waste, means the permanent isolation of that waste in accordance with requirements established by the United States nuclear regulatory commission or the licensing agreement state. (G) "Disposal site" means that portion of a facility that is used for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste and that consists of disposal units and a buffer zone. "Disposal unit" means a discrete portion of such a facility into which low-level radioactive waste is placed for disposal. (H)(1) Except as provided in division (H)(2) of this section, "facility" means the state, any political subdivision, person, public or private institution, or group, or any unit of one of those entities, but does not include the federal government or any of its agencies. (2) For the purposes of the disposal of low-level radioactive waste, "facility" has the same meaning as in section 3747.01 of the Revised Code. (I) "Handle" means receive, possess, use, store, transfer, install, service, or dispose of sources of radiation unless possession is solely for the purpose of transportation. (J) "Handler" means a facility that handles sources of radiation unless possession is solely for the purpose of transportation. (K) "Inspection" means an official review, examination, or observation, including, without limitation, tests, surveys, and monitoring, that is used to determine compliance with rules, orders, requirements, and conditions of the department of health and that is conducted by the director of health. (L) "Low-level radioactive waste" has the same meaning as in section 3747.01 of the Revised Code with regard to the disposal of low-level radioactive waste. In regard to regulatory control at locations other than a disposal facility, "low-level radioactive waste" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C.A. 2021b. (M) "Quality assurance program" means a program providing for verification by written procedures such as testing, auditing, and inspection to ensure that deficiencies, deviations, defective equipment, or unsafe practices, or a combination thereof, relating to the use, disposal, management, or manufacture of radiation sources are identified, promptly corrected, and reported to the appropriate regulatory authorities. (N) "Radiation" means ionizing and nonionizing radiation. (1) "Ionizing radiation" means gamma rays and X-rays, alpha and beta particles, high-speed electrons, neutrons, protons, and other nuclear particles, but does not include sound or radio waves or visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light. (2) "Nonionizing radiation" means any electromagnetic radiation, other than ionizing electromagnetic radiation, or any sonic, ultrasonic, or infrasonic wave. (O) "Radioactive material" means any solid, liquid, or gaseous material that emits ionizing radiation spontaneously. "Radioactive material" includes accelerator-produced and naturally occurring materials and byproduct, source, and special nuclear material. (P) "Radiation-generating equipment" means any manufactured product or device, or component of such a product or device, or any machine or system that during operation can generate or emit radiation, except those that emit radiation only from radioactive material. "Radiation-generating equipment" does not include either of the following: (1) Diathermy machines; (2) Microwave ovens, including food service microwave ovens used for commercial and industrial uses, television receivers, electric lamps, and other household appliances and products that generate very low levels of radiation. (Q) "Source material" means uranium, thorium, or any combination thereof in any physical or chemical form, or any ores that contain by weight at least one-twentieth of one per cent of uranium, thorium, or any combination thereof. "Source material" does not include special nuclear material. (R) "Source of radiation" means radioactive material or radiation-generating equipment. (S) "Special nuclear material" means either of the following: (1) Plutonium, uranium 233, uranium enriched in the isotope 233 or in the isotope 235, and any other material that the United States nuclear regulatory commission determines to be special nuclear material, but does not include source material pursuant to section 51 of the "Atomic Energy Act of 1954," 68 Stat. 919, 42 U.S.C.A. 2071. (2) Except for any source material, any material artificially enriched by any of the materials identified in division (S)(1) of this section. (T) "Storage" means the retention of radioactive materials, including low-level radioactive waste, prior to disposal in a manner that allows for surveillance, control, and subsequent retrieval. (U) "Medical practitioner" means a person who is authorized pursuant to Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code to practice dentistry; pursuant to Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; or pursuant to Chapter 4734. of the Revised Code to practice chiropractic. (V) "Medical-practitioner group" means a corporation, partnership, or other business entity, other than a hospital as defined in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code, consisting of medical practitioners. (W) "Naturally occurring radioactive material" means material that contains any nuclide that is radioactive in its natural physical state. "Naturally occurring radioactive material" does not include source material, byproduct material, or special nuclear material. (X) "Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material" means naturally occurring radioactive material with radionuclide concentrations that are increased by or as a result of past or present human activities. "Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material" does not include drill cuttings, natural background radiation, byproduct material, or source material. (Y) "Drill cuttings" means the soil, rock fragments, and pulverized material that are removed from a borehole and that may include a de minimus amount of fluid that results from a drilling process. Sec. 3748.04. The director of health, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt and may amend or rescind rules doing all of the following: (A) Listing types of radioactive material for which licensure by its handler is required and types of radiation-generating equipment for which registration by its handler is required, and establishing requirements governing them. Rules adopted under division (A) of this section shall be compatible with applicable federal regulations and shall establish all of the following, without limitation: (1) Requirements governing both of the following: (a) The licensing and inspection of handlers of radioactive material. Standards established in rules adopted under division (A)(1)(a) of this section regarding byproduct material or any activity that results in the production of that material, to the extent practicable, shall be equivalent to or more stringent than applicable standards established by the United States nuclear regulatory commission. (b) The registration and inspection of handlers of radiation-generating equipment. Standards established in rules adopted under division (A)(1)(b) of this section, to the extent practicable, shall be equivalent to applicable standards established by the food and drug administration in the United States department of health and human services. (2) Identification of and requirements governing possession and use of specifically licensed and generally licensed quantities of radioactive material as either sealed sources or unsealed sources; (3) A procedure for the issuance of and the frequency of renewal of the licenses of handlers of radioactive material, other than a license for a facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste, and of the certificates of registration of handlers of radiation-generating equipment; (4) Procedures for suspending and revoking the licenses of handlers of radioactive material and the certificates of registration of handlers of radiation-generating equipment; (5) Criteria to be used by the director of health in amending the license of a handler of radioactive material or the certificate of registration of a handler of radiation-generating equipment subsequent to its issuance; (6) Criteria for achieving and maintaining compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it by licensees and registrants; (7) Criteria governing environmental monitoring of licensed and registered activities to assess compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it; (8) Fees for both of the following: (a) The licensing of handlers, other than facilities for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste, of radioactive material; (b) The registration of handlers, other than facilities that are, or are operated by, medical practitioners or medical-practitioner groups, of radiation-generating equipment. (9) A fee schedule for both of the following that includes fees for reviews, conducted during an inspection, of shielding plans or the adequacy of shielding: (a) The inspection of handlers of radioactive material; (b) The inspection of handlers, other than facilities that are, or are operated by, medical practitioners or medical-practitioner groups, of radiation-generating equipment. (B)(1) Identifying sources of radiation, circumstances of possession, use, or disposal of sources of radiation, and levels of radiation that constitute an unreasonable or unnecessary risk to human health or the environment; (2) Establishing requirements for the achievement and maintenance of compliance with standards for the receipt, possession, use, storage, installation, transfer, servicing, and disposal of sources of radiation to prevent levels of radiation that constitute an unreasonable or unnecessary risk to human health or the environment; (3) Requiring the maintenance of records on the receipt, use, storage, transfer, and disposal of radioactive material, including technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material, and on the radiological safety aspects of the use and maintenance of radiation-generating equipment. The rules adopted under division (B)(3) of this section shall not require maintenance of records regarding naturally occurring radioactive material. In adopting rules under divisions (A) and (B) of this section, the director shall do the following: use standards no less stringent than the regulations adopted by the United States nuclear regulatory commission, the United States environmental protection agency, and the United States department of health and human services; consider reports of the national council on radiation protection and measurements and the relevant standards of the American national standards institute; and use the "Suggested State Regulations for Control of Radiation" prepared by the conference of radiation control program directors, inc., except that the director may deviate from those regulations if the director determines that doing so is warranted and does not pose a health, environmental, or safety risk. (C) Establishing fees, procedures, and requirements for certification as a radiation expert, including all of the following, without limitation: (1) Minimum training and experience requirements; (2) Procedures for applying for certification; (3) Procedures for review of applications and issuance of certificates; (4) Procedures for suspending and revoking certification. (D) Establishing a schedule for inspection of sources of radiation and their shielding and surroundings; (E)(D) Establishing the responsibilities of a radiation expert; (F)(E) Establishing criteria for quality assurance programs for licensees of radioactive material and registrants of radiation-generating equipment; (G)(F) Establishing fees to be paid by any facility that, on September 8, 1995, holds a license from the United States nuclear regulatory commission in order to provide moneys necessary for the transfer of licensing and other regulatory authority from the commission to the state pursuant to section 3748.03 of the Revised Code. Rules adopted under this division shall stipulate that fees so established do not apply to any functions dealing specifically with a facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste. Fees collected under this division shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the general operations fund created in section 3701.83 of the Revised Code. The fees shall be used solely to administer and enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it. (H)(G) Establishing fees to be collected annually from generators of low-level radioactive waste, which shall be based upon the volume and radioactivity of the waste generated and the costs of administering low-level radioactive waste management activities under this chapter and rules adopted under it. All fees collected under this division shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the general operations fund created in section 3701.83 of the Revised Code. The fees shall be used solely to administer and enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it. Any fee required under this division that remains unpaid on the ninety-first day after the original invoice date shall be assessed an additional amount equal to ten per cent of the original fee. (I)(H) Establishing requirements governing closure, decontamination, decommissioning, reclamation, and long-term surveillance and care of a facility licensed under this chapter and rules adopted under it. Rules adopted under division (I)(H) of this section shall include, without limitation, all of the following: (1) Standards and procedures to ensure that a licensee prepares a decommissioning funding plan that provides an adequate financial guaranty to permit the completion of all requirements governing the closure, decontamination, decommissioning, and reclamation of sites, structures, and equipment used in conjunction with a licensed activity; (2) For licensed activities where radioactive material that will require surveillance or care is likely to remain at the site after the licensed activities cease, as indicated in the application for the license submitted under section 3748.07 of the Revised Code, standards and procedures to ensure that the licensee prepares an additional decommissioning funding plan for long-term surveillance and care, before termination of the license, that provides an additional adequate financial guaranty as necessary to provide for that surveillance and care; (3) For the purposes of the decommissioning funding plans required in rules adopted under divisions (I)(1)(H)(1) and (2) of this section, the types of acceptable financial guaranties, which shall include bonds issued by fidelity or surety companies authorized to do business in the state, certificates of deposit, deposits of government securities, irrevocable letters or lines of credit, trust funds, escrow accounts, or other similar types of arrangements, but shall not include any arrangement that constitutes self-insurance; (4) A requirement that the decommissioning funding plans required in rules adopted under divisions (I)(1)(H)(1) and (2) of this section contain financial guaranties in amounts sufficient to ensure compliance with any standards established by the United States nuclear regulatory commission, or by the state if it has become an agreement state pursuant to section 3748.03 of the Revised Code, pertaining to closure, decontamination, decommissioning, reclamation, and long-term surveillance and care of licensed activities and sites of licensees. Standards established in rules adopted under division (I)(H) of this section regarding any activity that resulted in the production of byproduct material, as defined in division (A)(2) of section 3748.01 of the Revised Code, to the extent practicable, shall be equivalent to or more stringent than standards established by the United States nuclear regulatory commission for sites at which ores were processed primarily for their source material content and at which byproduct material, as defined in division (A)(2) of section 3748.01 of the Revised Code, is deposited. (J)(I) Establishing criteria governing inspections of a facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste, including, without limitation, the establishment of a resident inspector program at such a facility; (K)(J) Establishing requirements and procedures governing the filing of complaints under section 3748.16 of the Revised Code, including, without limitation, those governing intervention in a hearing held under division (B)(3) of that section; (L)(K) Establishing requirements governing technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material. Rules adopted under this division shall not apply to naturally occurring radioactive material. Sec. 3748.11. (A) A facility that is licensed under this chapter and rules adopted under it, including a facility that is licensed for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste, shall comply with all applicable rules adopted under division (I)(H) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code governing closure, decontamination, decommissioning, reclamation, and long-term surveillance and care of its licensed activity. (B) Unless there is federal jurisdiction for oversight of closure, decontamination, decommissioning, reclamation, and long-term surveillance and care of a licensed activity, those actions are the responsibility of the state. (C) When the director of health finds that a licensee has failed to comply with all requirements governing closure, decontamination, decommissioning, and reclamation of its licensed activity, the director shall make a finding of that fact and declare any financial guaranty provided for in the licensee's decommissioning funding plan prepared in accordance with rules adopted under division (I)(1)(H)(1) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code forfeited in the amount established by the director. The director shall certify the total forfeiture to the attorney general, who shall collect the amount. Except as otherwise provided in this section, moneys collected from forfeitures under this division shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the radiation site closure and reclamation fund, which is hereby created. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The director shall use moneys in the fund exclusively to complete actions necessary to comply with requirements governing closure, decontamination, decommissioning, and reclamation regarding licensed activities for which financial guaranties have been forfeited under this division. The director may enter into contracts for those purposes. (D) When the director finds that a licensee to whom standards and procedures established in rules adopted under division (I)(2)(H)(2) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code apply has failed to comply with long-term surveillance and care requirements established in rules adopted under division (I) of that section, the director shall make a finding of that fact and declare any financial guaranty provided for in the licensee's decommissioning funding plan prepared in accordance with rules adopted under division (I)(2) of that section forfeited in the amount established by the director. The director shall certify the total forfeiture to the attorney general, who shall collect the amount. Except as otherwise provided in this section, moneys collected from forfeitures under this division shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the radiation long-term care fund, which is hereby created. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The director shall use moneys in the fund exclusively to complete actions necessary to comply with requirements governing long-term surveillance, care, and maintenance regarding licensed activities for which financial guaranties have been forfeited under this division. The director may enter into contracts for those purposes. (E) Moneys collected from the forfeiture of any financial guaranty under division (C) or (D) of this section by the licensee of a facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the long-term care fund created pursuant to section 3747.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3748.13. (A) The director of health shall inspect sources of radiation for which licensure or registration by the handler is required, and the sources' shielding and surroundings, according to the schedule established in rules adopted under division (D)(C) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. In accordance with rules adopted under section 3748.04 of the Revised Code, the director shall inspect all records and operating procedures of handlers that install or service sources of radiation and all sources of radiation for which licensure of radioactive material or registration of radiation-generating equipment by the handler is required. The director may make other inspections upon receiving complaints or other evidence of a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it. The director shall require any hospital registered under division (A) of section 3701.07 of the Revised Code to develop and maintain a quality assurance program for all sources of radiation-generating equipment. A The hospital shall designate a certified radiation expert shall who meets the applicable qualifications in section 3748.131 of the Revised Code to conduct oversight and maintenance of the program and maintain a record of such designation and the expert's qualifications. The certified radiation expert shall file a report of audits of the program with the director on forms prescribed by the director. The audit reports shall become part of the inspection record. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, a facility shall pay inspection fees for radioactive material and radiation-generating equipment according to the schedule and categories established in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) A facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group shall pay inspection fees for radiation-generating equipment according to the following schedule and categories: 1 2 A First dental x-ray tube $310.00 B Each additional dental x-ray tube at the same location $154.00 C First medical x-ray tube $614.00 D Each additional medical x-ray tube at the same location $326.00 E Each unit of ionizing radiation-generating equipment capable of operating at or above 250 kilovoltage peak $1,220.00 F First nonionizing radiation-generating equipment of any kind $614.00 G Each additional nonionizing radiation-generating equipment of any kind at the same location $326.00 (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the fee for the inspection of a facility that proposes to handle radioactive material or radiation-generating equipment and is not licensed or registered, and for which no license or registration application is pending at the time of inspection, is four hundred seventy-four dollars plus the applicable fee specified in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) For a facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group and proposes to handle radiation-generating equipment, the fee for an inspection if the facility is not licensed or registered, and no license or registration is pending at the time of inspection, is four hundred seventy-four dollars plus the fee applicable under the schedule in division (B)(2) of this section. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, for a facility that handles radioactive material or radiation-generating equipment, the fee for an inspection to determine whether violations cited in a previous inspection have been corrected is the amount specified in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) For a facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group and handles radiation-generating equipment, the fee for an inspection to determine whether violations cited in a previous inspection have been corrected is fifty per cent of the applicable fee under the schedule in division (B)(2) of this section. (E) The director may conduct a review of shielding plans or the adequacy of shielding on the request of a licensee or registrant or an applicant for licensure or registration or during an inspection when the director considers a review to be necessary. (1) Except as provided in division (E)(2) of this section, the fee for the review is the applicable amount specified in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) For a facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group and handles or proposes to handle radiation-generating equipment, the fee for the review is seven hundred sixty-two dollars for each room where a source of radiation is used and is in addition to any other fee applicable under the schedule in division (B)(2) of this section. (F) All fees shall be paid to the department of health no later than thirty days after the invoice for the fee is mailed. Fees shall be deposited in the general operations fund created in section 3701.83 of the Revised Code. The fees shall be used solely to administer and enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it. (G) Any fee required under this section that remains unpaid on the ninety-first day after the original invoice date shall be assessed an additional amount equal to ten per cent of the original fee. (H) If the director determines that a board of health of a city or general health district is qualified to conduct inspections of radiation-generating equipment, the director may delegate to the board, by contract, the authority to conduct such inspections. In making a determination of the qualifications of a board of health to conduct those inspections, the director shall evaluate the credentials of the individuals who are to conduct the inspections of radiation-generating equipment and the radiation detection and measuring equipment available to them for that purpose. If a contract is entered into, the board shall have the same authority to make inspections of radiation-generating equipment as the director has under this chapter and rules adopted under it. The contract shall stipulate that only individuals approved by the director as qualified shall be permitted to inspect radiation-generating equipment under the contract's provisions. The contract shall provide for such compensation for services as is agreed to by the director and the board of health of the contracting health district. The director may reevaluate the credentials of the inspection personnel and their radiation detecting and measuring equipment as often as the director considers necessary and may terminate any contract with the board of health of any health district that, in the director's opinion, is not satisfactorily performing the terms of the contract. (I) The director may enter at all reasonable times upon any public or private property to determine compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it. Sec. 3748.131. (A) A certified radiation expert in therapeutic radiation-generating equipment shall meet one or more of the following qualifications to oversee a quality assurance program under section 3748.13 of the Revised Code: (1) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the American board of radiology in therapeutic radiologic physics, therapeutic medical physics, or radiologic physics; (2) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the American board of medical physics in radiation oncology physics; (3) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the Canadian college of physicists in medicine in radiation oncology physics; (4) Satisfy both of the following requirements: (a) Hold a master's or doctorate degree in physics, medical physics, other physical science, engineering, or applied mathematics from an accredited college or university or an equivalent degree from a college or university located outside the United States approved by the department of education and workforce or the United States department of education; (b) Complete an applicable clinical residency from an accredited program or one year of full-time training in medical physics and one year of full-time work experience at a medical institution under the supervision of a medical physicist who holds a certification under division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (B) A certified radiation expert in diagnostic radiation-generating equipment shall meet one or more of the following qualifications to oversee a quality assurance program under section 3748.13 of the Revised Code: (1) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the American board of radiology in radiologic physics, diagnostic radiologic physics, or diagnostic medical physics; (2) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the American board of medical physics in medical physics with a specialty in diagnostic imaging physics; (3) Satisfy both of the following requirements: (a) Hold a master's or doctorate degree in physics, biophysics, medical physics, radiological physics or health physics, engineering, or applied mathematics with a minor in physics from an accredited college or university or an equivalent degree from a college or university located outside the United States approved by the department of education and workforce or the United States department of education; (b) Complete an applicable clinical residency from an accredited program or one year of full-time training in medical physics and one year of full-time work experience under the direct supervision of a certified radiation expert in diagnostic radiation-generating equipment. (C) A certified radiation expert in mammography radiation-generating equipment shall meet one or more of the following qualifications to oversee a quality assurance program under section 3748.13 of the Revised Code: (1) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the American board of radiology in radiologic physics, diagnostic radiologic physics, or diagnostic medical physics; (2) Possess a valid, unexpired certification from the American board of medical physics with a specialty in diagnostic imaging physics; (3) Satisfy all of the following requirements: (a) Hold a master's degree or higher in a physical science from an accredited college or university or an equivalent degree from a college or university located outside the United States approved by the department of education and workforce or the United States department of education; (b) Complete twenty semester hours or thirty quarter hours of graduate or undergraduate level physics and twenty contact hours of documented specialized training in conducting surveys of mammography facilities; (c) Demonstrate experience in conducting surveys of at least ten mammography x-ray units under the direct supervision of a certified radiation expert in mammography radiation-generating equipment. Sec. 3748.16. (A)(1) The director of health shall conduct regular inspections of the facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste in accordance with rules adopted under division (J)(I) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code and, in accordance with those rules, shall provide for at least one resident inspector at the facility. (2) Concentrations of radioactive materials released into the environment during operation, closure, institutional control, and long-term care of the facility shall be kept as low as are reasonably achievable and shall not exceed levels established in rules adopted under division (A)(7) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code or the standards set forth in 10 C.F.R. 61.41, whichever are more stringent. The director shall establish a program to monitor concentrations of radioactive materials so released and shall conduct an investigation if monitoring results indicate concentrations of radioactive materials at levels that are greater than the established background for a monitoring point to determine the source of the increased radiation level. (B)(1) An officer of an agency of the state or of a political subdivision, acting in the officer's representative capacity, or any person may file a written complaint with the director, in accordance with rules adopted under division (K)(J) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code, regarding the failure or alleged failure of the facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste to comply with health or safety requirements established under this chapter or Chapter 3747. of the Revised Code or rules adopted under them. The complaint shall be verified by an affidavit of the complainant or the complainant's agent or attorney. The affidavit may be made before any person authorized by law to administer oaths and shall be signed by the officer or person who makes it. The person before whom it was taken shall certify that it was sworn to before that person and signed in that person's presence, and the certificate signed officially by that person shall be evidence that the affidavit was made, that the name of the officer or person was written by that officer or person, and that the signer was that officer or person. (2) Upon receipt of a complaint under division (B)(1) of this section, the director shall cause a prompt investigation to be conducted as is reasonably necessary to determine whether the facility has failed or is failing to comply with the health or safety requirements identified in the complaint. The investigation shall include a discussion of the complaint with the contractor. (3) The director may hold a hearing on the complaint. Not less than twenty days before the hearing, the director shall cause publication of a notice of the hearing in the county in which the facility is located and shall mail written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the complainant and to the contractor. The hearing shall be conducted before the director or a hearing examiner designated by the director. The department of health and the contractor shall be parties. The complainant may participate as a party by filing with the director, at any time prior to the hearing, a written notice of the complainant's intent to participate. Any other person may be permitted to intervene upon the granting by the director or hearing examiner of a motion to intervene filed in accordance with rules adopted under division (K)(J) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. If the director does not hold a hearing, the director shall provide an opportunity to the complainant and the contractor to attend a conference with the director concerning the complaint. (4) Following the completion of the investigation under division (B)(2) of this section and the hearing or conference under division (B)(3) of this section, if the director determines that the facility is in compliance with the health or safety requirements identified in the complaint, the director shall dismiss the complaint. If the director determines that the facility is not in compliance with those requirements, the director shall issue an order under division (B)(4) of section 3748.05 of the Revised Code requiring the contractor to bring the facility into compliance and to submit a written discussion of how that will be accomplished. The director also may do any or all of the following: (a) Suspend or revoke the facility's license in accordance with rules adopted under division (A) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue an order assessing an administrative penalty in accordance with rules adopted under division (A)(6) of section 3748.05 of the Revised Code; (c) Request the attorney general, in writing, to commence appropriate legal proceedings, including a civil action for imposition of a civil penalty under section 3748.19 of the Revised Code and criminal prosecution. (C) If the director suspends or revokes the license of the facility for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste for any reason in accordance with rules adopted under division (A) or (B) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code, the contractor shall indemnify the state for any loss suffered by the state as a result of the lack of disposal capacity for low-level radioactive waste that otherwise would have been disposed of at the facility. (D) The provisions of division (A) of this section establishing requirements governing the director and divisions (B) and (C) of this section apply only if the state becomes an agreement state pursuant to section 3748.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3773.31. As used in sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code: (A) "Professional boxer" means a boxer who competes for a prize, in cash or otherwise, that has a value of more than twenty-five dollars. (B) "Amateur" means a contestant who does not compete for a prize, in cash or otherwise, that has a value of more than twenty-five dollars. (C) "Contestant" means a contestant in a public boxing match or exhibition. (D) "Public boxing match or exhibition" means any public or private competition that involves the sports of boxing, kick boxing, karate, tough man contests or tough guy contests, or any other form of boxing or martial arts, but does not include professional wrestling. (E) "Tough man contests or tough guy contests" means any competition that involves any physical contact bout between two or more individuals who attempt to knock out the opponent by using boxing, kicking, or choking techniques or martial arts tactics or any combination of such techniques and tactics. (F) "Public boxing or wrestling match or exhibition" means any public or private competition that involves the sports of boxing, kick boxing, karate, tough man contests or tough guy contests, professional wrestling, or any other form of boxing or martial arts. (G) "Boxing match or exhibition" means a public or private competition pertaining to the sport of boxing. Sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code do not apply to elementary or secondary school, college, or university boxing, karate, or wrestling coaches who receive compensation for teaching or coaching boxing, karate, or wrestling only from the school, college, or university; to amateur boxers; or to boxing, karate, or wrestling matches and exhibitions in which all of the contestants are amateur boxers, amateur participants in a karate match or exhibition, or amateur wrestlers from an elementary or secondary school, a college, or a university. Sec. 3773.33. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio athletic commission, which is a part of the department of commerce for administrative purposes. The director of commerce shall appoint an employee of the department as the administrator of athletics to act as executive officer of the commission. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the director. The commission shall consist of five voting members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, not more than three of whom shall be of the same political party, and two nonvoting members, one of whom shall be a member of the senate appointed by and to serve at the pleasure of the president of the senate and one of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives appointed by and to serve at the pleasure of the speaker of the house of representatives. To be eligible for appointment as a voting member, a person shall be a qualified elector and a resident of the state for not less than five years immediately preceding the person's appointment. Two voting members shall be knowledgeable in boxing and mixed martial arts. One commission member shall hold the degree of doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy. (B) No person shall be appointed to the commission or be an employee of the commission who is licensed, registered, or regulated by the commission. No member shall have any legal or beneficial interest, direct or indirect, pecuniary or otherwise, in any person who is licensed, registered, or regulated by the commission or who participates in prize fights or public boxing or wrestling matches or exhibitions. No member shall participate in any fight, match, or exhibition other than in the member's official capacity as a member of the commission, or as an inspector as authorized in section 3773.52 of the Revised Code. (C) The governor shall appoint the voting members to the commission. Of the initial appointments, two shall be for terms ending one year after September 3, 1996, two shall be for terms ending two years after September 3, 1996, and one shall be for a term ending three years after September 3, 1996. Thereafter, terms of office shall be for three years, each term ending the same day of the same month of the year as did the term which it succeeds. Each member shall hold office from the date of the member's appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the term. Any member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office. The governor shall name one voting member as chairperson of the commission at the time of making the appointment of any member for a full term. Three voting members shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of the majority of voting members shall be necessary for any action taken by the commission. No vacancy on the commission impairs the authority of the remaining members to exercise all powers of the commission. Voting members, when engaged in commission duties, shall receive a per diem compensation determined in accordance with division (J) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code, and all members shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. Each voting member, before entering upon the discharge of the member's duties, shall file a surety bond payable to the treasurer of state in the sum of ten thousand dollars. Each surety bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, and filed in the office of the secretary of state. The governor may remove any voting member for malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office after giving the member a copy of the charges against the member and affording the member an opportunity for a public hearing, at which the member may be represented by counsel, upon not less than ten days' notice. If the member is removed, the governor shall file a complete statement of all charges made against the member and the governor's finding on the charges in the office of the secretary of state, together with a complete report of the proceedings. The governor's decision shall be final. Sec. 3773.34. (A) The Ohio athletic commission shall adopt and may amend or rescind rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, prescribing the conditions under which prize fights and public boxing or wrestling matches or exhibitions may be conducted, classifying professional boxers by weight, and providing for the administration of sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code. The rules may require that an applicant for a contestant's license to participate in a public boxing match or exhibition take an HIV test, as defined in section 3701.24 of the Revised Code, before being issued the contestant's license and may require that a licensed contestant take such an HIV test before participating in a public boxing match or exhibition. The commission, or the commission's executive director administrator of athletics when authorized by the commission, may issue, deny, suspend, or revoke permits to hold prize fights and public boxing or wrestling matches or exhibitions. The commission, or the administrator when authorized by the commission, may issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses to persons engaged in any public boxing match or exhibition as authorized by sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code. (B) In addition to the duties set forth in this chapter, the Ohio athletic commission and the administrator shall take action as necessary to carry out the provisions of Chapter 4771. of the Revised Code governing athlete agents. (C) On or before the thirty-first day of December of each year, the commission shall make a report to the governor of its proceedings for the year ending on the first day of December of that calendar year, and may include in the report any recommendations pertaining to its duties. Sec. 3773.341. (A) The Ohio athletic commission shall regulate tough man contests and tough guy contests as competitions that involve mixed martial arts. (B) Any person who desires to participate in a tough man contest or tough guy contest as a referee, judge, matchmaker, timekeeper, manager, trainer, contestant, or second shall be licensed in the same manner as a participant in a competition that involves mixed martial arts. Neither the commission nor the administrator of athletics shall require a separate license for that purpose. (C) Any person who holds a promoter's license and who desires to conduct a tough man contest or tough guy contest shall obtain a permit in the same manner as for any other contest regulated by the commission. Neither the commission nor the administrator shall require a separate permit for that purpose. Sec. 3773.35. Any person who wishes to conduct a public or private competition that involves boxing, wrestling, mixed martial arts, kick boxing, tough man contests, tough guy contests, or any other form of boxing or martial arts shall apply to the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics for a promoter's license. Each application shall be filed with the commission administrator on forms provided by the commissionadministrator, and shall be accompanied by an application fee as prescribed in section 3773.43 of the Revised Code and, with the exception of wrestling events, by a surety bond of not less than twenty thousand dollars conditioned for compliance with sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code and the rules of the Ohio athletic commission. The commission shall prescribe the form of the application for the promoter's license. The application shall include the name of the applicant, the post office address of the applicant, and any other information the commission requires. Sec. 3773.36. (A) Upon the proper filing of an application to conduct any public or private competition that involves boxing, mixed martial arts, kick boxing, tough man contests, tough guy contests, or any other form of boxing or martial arts, accompanied by the surety bond and the application fee, or upon the proper filing of an application to conduct any public or private competition that involves wrestling accompanied by the application fee, the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics shall issue a promoter's license to the applicant if it the administrator finds that the applicant is not in default on any payment, obligation, or debt payable to the state under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code, is financially responsible, and is knowledgeable in the proper conduct of such matches or exhibitions. (B) Notwithstanding the requirements for a license under division (A) of this section, the commission administrator shall issue a promoter's license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a promoter in a state that does not issue that license. (C) Each license issued pursuant to this section shall bear the name of the licensee, the post office address of the licensee, the date of expiration, an identification number designated by the commissionadministrator, and the seal of the commissiondepartment of commerce. (D) A promoter's license shall expire twelve months after its date of issuance and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. A promoter's license may be renewed upon application to the commission administrator and upon payment of the renewal fee prescribed in section 3773.43 of the Revised Code. The commission administrator shall renew the license unless it the administrator denies the application for renewal for one or more reasons stated in section 3123.47 or 3773.53 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3773.37. The Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics shall cause a photograph with identification of any person signing the application for a license under section 3773.35 or 3773.41 of the Revised Code to be taken in duplicate and filed with the commission.. For purposes of this section, the commission administrator may allow a photograph with identification to be a photocopy of a valid commercial driver's license issued under Chapter 4506. or a driver's license issued under Chapter 4507. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3773.38. Each person who holds a promoter's license issued under section 3773.36 of the Revised Code who desires to conduct a public boxing or wrestling match or exhibition where one or more contests are to be held shall obtain a permit from the Ohio athletic commission or the commission's executive director administrator of athletics when the executive director administrator is authorized by the commission to issue those types of permits. Application for such a permit shall be made in writing and on forms prescribed by the commission, shall be filed with the commission or the administrator, and shall be accompanied by the permit fee prescribed in section 3773.43 of the Revised Code. The application for a permit issued under this section shall include the date and starting time of the match or exhibition, the address of the place where the match or exhibition is to be held, the names of the contestants, the seating capacity of the building or hall where the exhibition is to be held, the admission charge or any other charges, the amount of compensation or the percentage of gate receipts to be paid to each contestant, the name and address of the applicant, a copy of the current official rules that govern the particular sport, and the serial number of the applicant's promoter's license. The commission, or the commission's executive director administrator when authorized by the commission, may require the applicant to deposit with the commission or the administrator before a public boxing match or exhibition a cash bond, certified check, bank draft, or surety bond in an amount equal to five per cent of the estimated gross receipts from the match or exhibition. Sec. 3773.39. (A) Upon receipt of an application for a permit to hold a public boxing or wrestling match or exhibition under section 3773.38 of the Revised Code, the Ohio athletic commission, or the commission's executive director administrator of athletics when authorized by the commission, shall determine if the applicant holds a valid promoter's license issued pursuant to section 3773.36 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of an application for a permit to hold a public boxing match or exhibition, the commission, or the commission's executive director administrator when authorized by the commission, also shall determine if the contestants are evenly and fairly matched according to skill, experience, and weight so as to produce a fair and sportsmanlike contest, and whether the applicant is financially responsible and is able to pay to each contestant the compensation or percentage of the gate receipts named in the application. The commission, or the commission's executive director administrator when authorized by the commission, may, if applicable, require the applicant to deposit with it within forty-eight hours before the match or exhibition the total compensation or estimated portion of gate receipts to be paid all contestants named in the application made under section 3773.38 of the Revised Code. (B) If the commission, or the commission's executive director administrator when authorized by the commission, determines that the applicant has met all the requirements specified in division (A) of this section, the commission or executive director the administrator shall issue the applicant a permit to conduct the match or exhibition. If the applicant fails to deposit any compensation or portion of gate receipts required by the commission, or executive director the administrator before the first contest of the match or exhibition is held, the commission, or the commission's executive director administrator when authorized by the commission, may revoke the permit and order the applicant not to conduct the match or exhibition described in the permit. (C) Each permit issued pursuant to this section shall bear the name and post office address of the applicant, the address of the place where the public boxing or wrestling match or exhibition is to be held, the date and starting time of the match or exhibition, and a serial number designated by the commission or the administrator when authorized by the commission. A permit issued under this section shall allow the permit holder to conduct only the match or exhibition named in the permit. A permit is not transferable. Sec. 3773.40. No person who holds a promoter's license to conduct a public boxing match or exhibition under section 3773.36 of the Revised Code shall: (A) Hold any match or exhibition at any time or place other than that stated on a permit issued under section 3773.38 of the Revised Code; (B) Allow any contestant to participate in the match or exhibition unless the contestant is the licensed contestant named in the application for such permit or a licensed contestant authorized to compete as a substitute for such a contestant by the inspector assigned to the facility where the match or exhibition is held for that match or exhibition; (C) Charge a higher admission price for a match or exhibition than that stated in the application; (D) Pay a greater compensation or percentage of the gate receipts to any contestant than that stated in the application. The Ohio athletic commission, or the commission's executive director administrator of athletics when authorized by the commission, upon application by a holder of a permit under section 3773.38 of the Revised Code, may allow the permit holder to hold the match or exhibition for which the permit was issued at an alternative site that is within the same municipal corporation or township and that offers substantially similar seating facilities, or allow the permit holder to substitute contestants or seconds, provided that the substitute contestants are evenly matched with their opponents in skill, experience, and weight. Sec. 3773.41. Any person who desires to participate in a public boxing match, mixed martial arts event, or any other unarmed combat sport regulated by the Ohio athletic commission as a referee, judge, matchmaker, timekeeper, or contestant, or as a manager, trainer, or second of a contestant, shall apply for a license from the Ohio athletic commissionadministrator of athletics. The application shall be on forms provided by the commissionadministrator. Each application shall be accompanied by the application fee prescribed in section 3773.43 of the Revised Code. The applicant shall verify the application under oath. The commission shall prescribe the form of the application for a participant's license. The application shall include the correct and ring or assumed name, if any, of the applicant, the applicant's address, the applicant's date and place of birth, the applicant's occupation, and a copy of the applicant's win and loss record as a contestant, if applicable. Sec. 3773.42. Upon the proper filing of an application for a referee's, judge's, matchmaker's, timekeeper's, manager's, trainer's, contestant's, or second's license and payment of the applicable application fee, the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics shall issue the license to the applicant if it the administrator determines that the applicant is not likely to engage in acts detrimental to the fair and honest conduct of public boxing matches, mixed martial arts events, or any other unarmed combat sports regulated by the Ohio athletic commission and is qualified to hold such a license by reason of the applicant's knowledge and experience. A person shall not be determined to possess the knowledge and experience necessary to qualify that person to hold a referee's license unless all of the following conditions are met: (A) The person has completed such referee training requirements as the commission prescribes by rule. (B) The person possesses such experience requirements as the commission prescribes by rule. The commission administrator shall issue a referee's license to each person who meets the requirements of divisions (A) and (B) of this section. If upon the proper filing of an application for a contestant's license the commission administrator determines that the applicant is not likely to engage in acts detrimental to the conduct of public boxing matches, mixed martial arts events, or any other unarmed combat sports regulated by the commission and possesses sufficient knowledge and experience, the commission administrator shall issue the license to the applicant. Each license issued pursuant to this section shall bear the correct name, or assumed name, if any, of the licensee, the address of the licensee, the date of issue, and a number designated by the commissionadministrator. A license issued pursuant to this section shall expire twelve months after its date of issue unless renewed. Upon application for renewal and payment of the renewal fee prescribed in section 3773.43 of the Revised Code, the commission administrator shall renew the license unless it the administrator denies the application for one or more reasons stated in section 3123.47 or 3773.53 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3773.421. The Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics shall issue a referee's, judge's, matchmaker's, timekeeper's, manager's, trainer's, contestant's, or second's license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (A) The applicant holds a license in another state. (B) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a referee, judge, matchmaker, timekeeper, manager, trainer, contestant, or second in a state that does not issue that license. Sec. 3773.43. The Ohio athletic commission and the administrator of athletics shall charge the following fees: (A) For an application for or renewal of a promoter's license for a public or private competition that involves boxing, mixed martial arts, kick boxing, tough man contests, tough guy contests, or any other form of boxing or martial arts, one hundred dollars. (B) For an application for or renewal of a license to participate in a public boxing match or exhibition as a contestant, or as a referee, judge, matchmaker, manager, timekeeper, trainer, or second of a contestant, twenty dollars. (C) For a permit to conduct a public boxing match or exhibition, fifty dollars. (D) For an application for or renewal of a promoter's license for a public or private competition that involves wrestling, two hundred dollars. (E) For a permit to conduct a professional wrestling match or exhibition, one hundred dollars. The commission, subject to the approval of the controlling board, may establish fees in excess of the amounts provided in this section, provided that such fees do not exceed the amounts permitted by this section by more than fifty per cent. The fees prescribed by this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state, who shall deposit the fees in the occupational licensing and regulatory fund. Sec. 3773.45. (A) The Ohio athletic commission shall adopt, and may amend or rescind, rules that do both of the following: (1) Require the physical examination by appropriate medical personnel of each contestant in any public competition that involves boxing, mixed martial arts, kick boxing, karate, tough man contests, or any other form of boxing or martial arts within a specified time period before and after the competition to determine whether the contestant is physically fit to compete in the competition under specified standards, has sustained physical injuries in the competition, or requires follow-up examination; and (2) Require the reporting of each examination to the commissionadministrator of athletics. (B) No holder of a promoter's license shall conduct a boxing match or exhibition that exceeds twelve rounds. Each round shall be not more than three minutes in length. A period of at least one minute, during which no boxing or sparring takes place, shall occur between rounds. No holder of a promoter's license or a permit issued under section 3773.39 of the Revised Code shall allow a professional boxer to participate in more than twelve rounds of boxing within a period of seventy-two consecutive hours. For any match or exhibition or for a class of contestants, the commission may limit the number of rounds within the maximum of twelve rounds. (C) No person shall conduct a boxing match or exhibition unless a licensed referee appointed by the commission administrator and paid by the person is present. The referee shall direct and control the match or exhibition. Before each match or exhibition the referee shall obtain from each contestant the name of the contestant's chief second and shall hold the chief second responsible for the conduct of any assistant seconds during the match or exhibition. The referee may declare a prize, remuneration, or purse or any part thereof to which a contestant is otherwise entitled withheld if, in the referee's judgment, the contestant is not competing or did not compete honestly. A contestant may appeal the referee's decision in a hearing before the commission conducted in accordance with section 3773.52 of the Revised Code. (D) No person shall hold or conduct a boxing match or exhibition unless three licensed judges appointed by the commission administrator and paid by the person are present. Each judge shall render a decision at the end of each match or exhibition. The judges shall determine the outcome of the match or exhibition, and their decision shall be final. (E) Each contestant in a boxing match or exhibition shall wear gloves weighing not less than six ounces during the boxing match or exhibition. Sec. 3773.51. The Ohio athletic commission director of commerce shall appoint from among licensed referees, physicians, timekeepers, and judges the officials for public boxing matches and exhibitions held under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code. These officials shall be employed by the commission director as provided in section 3773.56 of the Revised Code and shall be paid by the person conducting the match or exhibition. Sec. 3773.52. The Ohio athletic commission director of commerce shall employ inspectors to attend each public boxing match or exhibition held under a permit issued under section 3773.38 of the Revised Code. Only one inspector shall be assigned to any one facility for any one match or exhibition. Any member of the commission may act as an inspector, and when acting as an inspector shall be paid as provided in this section. The inspector shall monitor the sale of tickets from the premises box office on the day of the match or exhibition and, immediately following the counting of the gross proceeds, obtain a box office statement from the person conducting the match or exhibition and mail it to the commissionadministrator of athletics. The inspector shall have complete access to any books, records, and papers pertaining to the match or exhibition. The inspector shall give bond in the sum of five thousand dollars with sufficient sureties to be approved by and made payable to the treasurer of state. The bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. The compensation of such inspector for attending a match or exhibition, and the inspector's actual and necessary travel expenses, shall be charged to the holder of the permit at whose facility the inspector serves. The inspector shall be paid a salary fixed in accordance with Chapter 124. of the Revised Code. The inspector may order a prize, remuneration, purse, or any part thereof withheld from a contestant if the inspector believes the contestant did not compete to the best of the contestant's ability. The inspector shall file any charges with the commission which shall hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and issue a final order within thirty days after the inspector files charges. If the commission finds that the contestant did not compete to the best of the contestant's ability, it, or the administrator when authorized by the commission, may revoke the contestant's license. When a license is so revoked, any prize, remuneration, purse, or part thereof that the contestant otherwise would have received shall be paid to the commission and shall become the property of the state. Sec. 3773.53. The On receiving a complaint of a violation of sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code or a rule adopted by the Ohio athletic commission, the commission shall conduct an investigation of the complaint. If the commission finds reasonable cause to believe a violation occurred, the commission shall conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine if a violation occurred. If the commission finds a violation occurred, the commission may revoke, or suspend, or and the administrator of athletics may refuse to renew, any license issued under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code if the licensee: (A) Has committed an act detrimental to any sport regulated by this chapter or to the public interest, convenience, or necessity; (B) Is associating or consorting with any person who has been convicted of a crime involving the sports regulated by the commission, including a conviction under sectionssection 2913.02, 2915.05, or 2921.02 of the Revised Code; (C) Is or has been consorting with bookmakers or gamblers, or has engaged in similar pursuits; (D) Is financially irresponsible; (E) Has been found guilty of any fraud or misrepresentation in connection with any sport regulated by this chapter; (F) Has violated any law with respect to any sport regulated by this chapter or any rule or order of the commission; (G) Has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of sectionssection 2913.02, 2915.05, or 2921.02 of the Revised Code; (H) Has engaged in any other activity that the commission determines is detrimental to any sport regulated by this chapter; (I) Has otherwise violated sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code or any rules adopted under those sections. The commission, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and in addition to any other action it may take under this chapter, may impose a fine in an amount to be determined by rule of the commission adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code against any person licensed under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code for a violation of any of these sections or a violation of any rule or order of the commission. The amount of fines collected shall be deposited into the general revenue fund. Sec. 3773.54. No person who conducts a public boxing match or exhibition to which sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code apply shall fail to mail to the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics a written report that shows the number of tickets sold for the match or exhibition and the amount of gross proceeds within twenty-four hours after the determination of the outcome of the match or exhibition. The person shall pay to the commission administrator a tax of five per cent of the gross proceeds from the sale of tickets to the match or exhibition. The Ohio athletic commission shall adopt rules concerning the time of payment of such taxes. Such taxes shall be levied for the purpose of providing revenue with which the state may regulate boxing, kick boxing, karate, tough man contests or tough guy contests, wrestling, and any other form of boxing or martial arts. The commissionadministrator, before granting a promoter's license under section 3773.36 of the Revised Code to any person other than a promoter of professional wrestling, shall obtain from the applicant a bond in the sum of not less than one thousand dollars, to be approved in form and sufficiency of its sureties by the treasurer of state. The bond shall be payable to the treasurer of state and shall be conditioned for the payment of the tax imposed by this section. Upon the filing and approval of the bond, the treasurer of state shall issue to the applicant two copies of a certificate verifying the filing and approval. The applicant shall file one copy in the office of the commission administrator with the license application. No license shall be issued until the certificate is filed. Sec. 3773.55. If any person fails to make a report relating to a public boxing match or exhibition that is required under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code, or files a report under section 3773.54 of the Revised Code that the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics finds unsatisfactory, the commission administrator may examine or cause to be examined the books and records of such person. The commission administrator may also subpoena and examine under oath any persons to determine the amount of gross proceeds for a match or exhibition and the amount of tax due. If a person who conducts a public boxing match or exhibition under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code does not pay the tax due on or before the date prescribed by the commissionadministrator, the person shall pay interest on the amount of tax due at a rate of five per cent per month, up to a maximum of twenty-five per cent. The commission administrator shall send a notice of delinquency to such a taxpayer. A delinquent taxpayer may be disqualified from receiving a new license. Any delinquent taxpayer who does not pay the tax due and the interest on it within twenty days after the notice of delinquency was mailed is in default on such taxes and interest. Any expenses incurred by the commission administrator in making examinations of the books and records of a taxpayer who is in default on such taxes and interest for a period of twenty days after the default occurred shall be paid by the taxpayer. The attorney general shall institute suit upon the bond filed pursuant to section 3773.35 of the Revised Code by a person who has defaulted on such taxes, interest, and expenses in order to recover such taxes, interest, and expenses. Sec. 3773.56. The Ohio athletic commission director of commerce may appoint an executive director and employ such persons as are necessary to administer sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 and Chapter 4771. of the Revised Code and fix their compensation. Such executive director and employees shall serve in the unclassified status and at the pleasure of the commissiondirector. All receipts received by the Ohio athletic commission or the administrator of athletics under sections 3773.31 to 3773.57 of the Revised Code shall be deposited in the occupational licensing and regulatory fund. All vouchers of the commission shall be approved by the chairperson of the commission. Sec. 3773.57. The Ohio athletic commission and the commission's executive director administrator of athletics shall not issue a license or permit to conduct public boxing or wrestling matches or exhibitions in a municipal corporation or the unincorporated portion of a township if the commission or the commission's executive director administrator determines that the legislative authority of the municipal corporation or board of township trustees has in effect an ordinance or resolution prohibiting such matches or exhibitions. Sec. 3773.59. On receipt of a notice pursuant to section 3123.43 of the Revised Code, the Ohio athletic commission and the administrator of athletics shall comply with sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 of the Revised Code and any applicable rules adopted under section 3123.63 of the Revised Code with respect to a license issued pursuant to this chapter. Sec. 3776.05. (A) A person seeking to register as an environmental health specialist or environmental health specialist in training shall submit an application to the director of health on a form prescribed by the director. Along with the application, the person shall submit the application fee prescribed in rules adopted under this chapter. (B) The director shall register an applicant as an environmental health specialist if the applicant complies with the examination requirements specified under section 3776.06 of the Revised Code and meets any of the following education and employment requirements: (1) Graduated from an accredited college or university with at least a baccalaureate degree, including at least forty-five quarter units or thirty semester units of science courses, including courses in life sciences, natural sciences, physical sciences, health sciences, or public health sciences approved by the director; and completed at least two years one year of full-time employment as an environmental health specialist; (2) Graduated from an accredited college or university with at least a baccalaureate degree, completed a major in environmental health science which included an internship program approved by the director; and completed at least one year six months of full-time employment as an environmental health specialist; (3) Graduated from an accredited college or university with a degree higher than a baccalaureate degree, including at least forty-five quarter units or thirty semester units of science courses, including courses in life sciences, natural sciences, physical sciences, health sciences, or public health sciences approved by the director; and completed at least one year of full-time employment as an environmental health specialist. (C)(1) The director shall register an applicant as an environmental health specialist in training if the applicant meets the educational qualifications of division (B)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, but does not meet the employment requirement of any such division. (2) An environmental health specialist in training shall apply for registration as an environmental health specialist within four five years after registration as an environmental health specialist in training. The director may extend the registration of any environmental health specialist in training who furnishes, in writing, sufficient cause for not applying for registration as an environmental health specialist within the four-year five-year period. However, the director shall not extend the registration more than an additional two years beyond the four-year five-year period. Sec. 4730.10. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, an individual seeking a license to practice as a physician assistant shall file with the state medical board a written application on a form prescribed and supplied by the board. The application shall include all of the following: (1) The applicant's name, residential address, business address, if any, and social security number; (2) Satisfactory proof that the applicant meets the age requirement specified in division (A)(1) of section 4730.11 of the Revised Code; (3) Satisfactory proof that the applicant meets either the educational requirements specified in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 4730.11 of the Revised Code or the educational or other applicable requirements specified in division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of that section; (4) Any other information the board requires. (B) At the time of making application for a license to practice, the applicant shall pay the board a fee of four one hundred fifty dollars, no part of which shall be returned. The fees shall be deposited in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. (C) The board shall issue a license to practice as a physician assistant in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a physician assistant in a state that does not issue that license. Sec. 4730.14. (A) A license to practice as a physician assistant shall be valid for a two-year period unless revoked or suspended, shall expire on the date that is two years after the date of issuance, and may be renewed for additional two-year periods in accordance with this section. A person seeking to renew a license shall apply to the state medical board for renewal prior to the license's expiration date. The board shall provide renewal notices to license holders at least one month prior to the expiration date. Applications shall be submitted to the board in a manner prescribed by the board. Each application shall be accompanied by a biennial renewal fee of two one hundred fifty dollars. The board shall deposit the fees in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. The applicant shall report any criminal offense that constitutes grounds for refusing to issue a license to practice under section 4730.25 of the Revised Code to which the applicant has pleaded guilty, of which the applicant has been found guilty, or for which the applicant has been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction, since last signing an application for a license to practice as a physician assistant. (B) To be eligible for renewal of a license, an applicant is subject to all of the following: (1) The applicant must certify to the board that the applicant has maintained certification by the national commission on certification of physician assistants or a successor organization that is recognized by the board by meeting the standards to hold current certification from the commission or its successor, including passing periodic recertification examinations; (2) Except as provided in section 5903.12 of the Revised Code, the applicant must certify to the board that the applicant is in compliance with the continuing medical education requirements necessary to hold current certification from the commission or its successor. (3) The applicant must comply with the renewal eligibility requirements established under section 4730.49 of the Revised Code that pertain to the applicant. (C) If an applicant submits a complete renewal application and qualifies for renewal pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall issue to the applicant a renewed license to practice as a physician assistant. (D) The board may require a random sample of physician assistants to submit materials documenting both of the following: (1) Certification by the national commission on certification of physician assistants or a successor organization that is recognized by the board; (2) Completion of the continuing medical education required to hold current certification from the commission or its successor. Division (D) of this section does not limit the board's authority to conduct investigations pursuant to section 4730.25 of the Revised Code. (E) A license to practice that is not renewed on or before its expiration date is automatically suspended on its expiration date. Continued practice after suspension of the license shall be considered as practicing in violation of division (A) of section 4730.02 of the Revised Code. (F) If a license has been suspended pursuant to division (E) of this section for two years or less, it may be reinstated. The board shall reinstate a license suspended for failure to renew upon an applicant's submission of a renewal application, the biennial renewal fee, and any applicable monetary penalty. If a license has been suspended pursuant to division (E) of this section for more than two years, it may be restored. In accordance with section 4730.28 of the Revised Code, the board may restore a license suspended for failure to renew upon an applicant's submission of a restoration application, the biennial renewal fee, and any applicable monetary penalty and compliance with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. The board shall not restore to an applicant a license to practice as a physician assistant unless the board, in its discretion, decides that the results of the criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible for a license issued pursuant to section 4730.12 of the Revised Code. The penalty for reinstatement shall be fifty dollars and the penalty for restoration shall be one hundred dollars. The board shall deposit penalties in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) If, through a random sample conducted under division (D) of this section or through any other means, the board finds that an individual who certified completion of the continuing medical education required to renew, reinstate, restore, or reactivate a license to practice did not complete the requisite continuing medical education, the board may do either of the following: (a) Take disciplinary action against the individual under section 4730.25 of the Revised Code, impose a civil penalty, or both; (b) Permit the individual to agree in writing to complete the continuing medical education and pay a civil penalty. (2) The board's finding in any disciplinary action taken under division (G)(1)(a) of this section shall be made pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members. (3) A civil penalty imposed under division (G)(1)(a) of this section or paid under division (G)(1)(b) of this section shall be in an amount specified by the board of not more than five thousand dollars. The board shall deposit civil penalties in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4731.294. (A) The state medical board may issue, without examination, a special activity certificate to any nonresident person individual seeking to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in conjunction with a special activity, program, or event taking place in this state. (B) An applicant for a special activity certificate shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board of all of the following: (1) The applicant holds a current, unrestricted license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery issued by another state or country and that , within the two-year period immediately preceding application, the applicant has done one of the following: (a) Actively practiced medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the United States; (b) Participated in a graduate medical education program accredited by either the accreditation council for graduate medical education of the American medical association or the American osteopathic association; (c) Successfully passed the federation licensing examination established by the federation of state medical boards, a special examination established by the federation of state medical boards, or all parts of a standard medical licensing examination established for purposes of determining the competence of individuals to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the United States. (2) The applicant meets the same educational requirements that individuals must meet under sections 4731.09 and 4731.14 of the Revised Code. (3) The applicant's practice in conjunction with the special activity, program, or event will be in the public interest. (C) The applicant shall pay a fee of one hundred twenty-five seventy-five dollars, but only if the applicant expects to be compensated for practicing medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in conjunction with the special activity, event, or program for which a certificate may be issued. (D) The holder of a special activity certificate may practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery only in conjunction with the special activity, event, or program for which the certificate is issued. The board may revoke a certificate on receiving proof satisfactory to the board that the holder of the certificate has engaged in practice in this state outside the scope of the certificate or that there are grounds for action against the certificate holder under section 4731.22 of the Revised Code. (E) A Each special activity certificate is valid for the shorter of thirty days or the duration of the special activity, program, or event for which it was issued. The A special activity certificate may not be renewed. (F) The board shall not require a person an individual holding a special activity certificate issued under this section to obtain a certificate under Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. (G) The state medical board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that specify how often an applicant may be granted a certificate under this sectionAn individual may apply for a special activity certificate under this section not more twelve times within a consecutive two-year period. Sec. 4759.08. (A) The state medical board shall charge and collect fees as described in this section for issuing the following: (1) An application for an initial dietitian license, or renewal of the license, two hundred twenty-five ninety-five dollars; (2) License renewal, one hundred eighty dollars; (3) A An application for a limited permit, or renewal of the permit, sixty-five fifty dollars; (4)(3) A duplicate license or permit, thirty-five dollars; (5)(4) In the case of a person holding a license issued under this chapter, a license verification fee of fifty dollars. (B) All receipts of the board shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state medical board operating fund in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4764.05. (A) The Ohio home inspector board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to do all of the following: (1) Establish standards to govern the issuance, renewal, suspension, and revocation of licenses, other sanctions that may be imposed for violations of this chapter, the conduct of hearings related to these actions, and the process of reactivating a license; (2) Establish the amount of the following fees: (a) Establish the following fees in an amount that is sufficient to defray necessary expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter: (i) The fee for applying for and receiving a license issued under section 4764.07 of the Revised Code and the special assessment for the home inspection recovery fund created in section 4764.21 of the Revised Code, which together shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars; (ii) The fee for renewal of a license under section 4764.09 of the Revised Code and the special assessment for the home inspection recovery fund created in section 4764.21 of the Revised Code, which together shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars. (b) The renewal late fee described in division (B)(2) of section 4764.09 of the Revised Code; (c) The fee an institution or organization described in division (A)(7) of this section shall pay to receive approval to offer continuing education courses and programs; (d) The fee an institution or organization that is approved to offer continuing education courses and programs shall pay for each course or program that the institution or organization wishes to have the superintendent approve pursuant to the rules adopted by the board under division (A)(8) of this section; (e) Any other fees as required by this chapter. (3) In accordance with division (C) of this section, specify methods and procedures the board shall use to approve a curriculum of education a person must successfully complete to obtain a license under this chapter; (4) In accordance with division (D) of this section, specify methods and procedures the board shall use to approve a curriculum of experience that a person may elect to complete the proof of experience requirement specified in division (D)(6) of section 4764.07 of the Revised Code; (5) Establish the administrative reporting and review requirements for parallel inspections or equivalency for field experience to assure that an applicant for a license satisfies the requirements of division (D)(6) of section 4764.07 of the Revised Code, as applicable; (6) Establish a curriculum for continuing education that a licensed home inspector shall complete to satisfy the requirements for continuing education specified in section 4764.08 of the Revised Code and procedures to assure continuing education requirements are updated periodically to make those requirements consistent with home inspection industry practices; (7) Establish requirements an institution or organization shall satisfy to obtain approval to provide courses or programs that enable a licensed home inspector to satisfy the requirements for continuing education specified in section 4764.08 of the Revised Code and establish procedures that the superintendent of real estate and professional licensing shall use to approve an institution or organization that satisfies the requirements the board establishes; (8) Establish procedures and standards that the superintendent shall use to approve courses and programs, including online courses and programs, offered by an institution or organization that is approved by the superintendent to offer continuing education courses or programs pursuant to the rules adopted by the board under division (A)(7) of this section; (9) Establish reporting requirements for a licensed home inspector to follow to demonstrate that the licensed home inspector successfully completed the continuing education requirements specified in section 4764.08 of the Revised Code; (10) Establish requirements for conducting home inspections, standards of practice for home inspectors, and conflict of interest prohibitions to the extent that those provisions do not conflict with divisions (A)(2) to (5) of section 4764.14 of the Revised Code; (11) Specify requirements for settlement agreements entered into between the superintendent and a licensed home inspector under division (C) of section 4764.13 of the Revised Code; (12) Establish procedures for providing licensees with notice and applications for renewal under section 4764.09 of the Revised Code; (13) Establish a set of standards of practice and canons of ethics for the home inspection industry; (14) Establish directions for the superintendent of real estate and professional licensing to follow regarding the scheduling, instruction, and offerings of home inspection courses a person must successfully complete to obtain a license issued under this chapter; (15) Establish requirements a licensed home inspector shall satisfy to obtain approval to prepare and conduct peer review sessions. (B) The board shall do all of the following: (1) On appeal by any party affected, or on its own motion, review any order of or application determination made by the superintendent, and as the board determines necessary, reverse, vacate, modify, or sustain such an order or determination; (2) Hear appeals from orders of the superintendent regarding claims against the home inspection recovery fund created under section 4764.21 of the Revised Code; (3) Disseminate to licensees and the public information relative to board activities and decisions; (4) Notify licensees of changes in state and federal laws pertaining to home inspections and relevant case law and inform licensees that they are subject to disciplinary action if they do not comply with the changes. (C) The board shall approve a curriculum of education a person must successfully complete to obtain a license issued under this chapter. The board shall approve a curriculum of education that satisfies all of the following requirements: (1) The curriculum is offered by an accredited public or private institution of higher education or a professional organization that has been approved by the board to offer a curriculum. (2) The curriculum includes a requirement that a person, to successfully complete the curriculum, complete at least eighty hours of classroom or online prelicensing instruction, including instruction about compliance with the requirements specified in this chapter, inspection safety, report writing, and any other administrative matters required by the board. (3) The curriculum satisfies any other requirements the board established in rules it adopts. (D) The board shall determine the equivalency of field experience that a person may elect to complete to satisfy the proof of experience requirement specified in division (D)(6) of section 4764.07 of the Revised Code. The board shall approve only a curriculum of experience that includes a requirement that a person, to successfully complete the curriculum, must perform at least forty hours of work in the home inspection field that allows the person to obtain practical experience or training regarding home inspections. The board shall approve only a curriculum of experience that includes a requirement that a person, to successfully complete the curriculum, must complete a peer review session with a licensed home inspector approved by the board before applying for a license. The peer review session may be used as part of the required eighty hours of prelicensing education. Sec. 4764.08. During each three-year period that a license is valid, a licensed home inspector shall successfully complete not less than fourteen forty-two hours of continuing education instruction annually during the three-year licensing period in courses or programs directly applicable to the standards of practice and requirements specified in rules adopted by the Ohio home inspector board pursuant to division (A)(10) of section 4764.05 of the Revised Code. The superintendent of real estate and professional licensing shall accept only those courses and programs the superintendent approves in accordance with division (A)(8) of section 4764.06 of the Revised Code prior to the date the licensed home inspector completes the course or program. The superintendent shall not include parallel inspections completed by a person for credit toward satisfying the continuing education requirements specified in this section. Sec. 4771.02. (A) No athlete agent shall enter into an agent contract with an athlete unless the agent complies with all of the following agent contract requirements: (1) The agent contract is in writing on a form approved by the Ohio athletic commission and includes all agreements between the parties. (2) The agent contract includes in boldface, twelve-point type, on the initial page of the agent contract, the following language: "The athlete agent entering this agreement is registered to serve as an athlete agent with the Ohio athletic commissionunder Chapter 4771. of the Revised Code. Registration of an athlete agent under Chapter 4771. of the Revised Code that chapter does not imply approval by the commission of the terms and conditions of this contract or the competence of the athlete agent." (3) The agent contract includes the following language in boldface, twelve-point type, near the space provided for an athlete to sign or otherwise acknowledge agreement to the terms of the contract: "Warning to the student athlete: when you sign this contract, you may immediately lose your eligibility to compete in any amateur or intercollegiate athletics. Accordingly, you must give written notice that you have entered into this contract to the athletic director or person of similar position at the educational institution or institution of higher education in which you are enrolled, or to which you have formally acknowledged your plans to attend, prior to the earlier of participating in or practicing for an officially sanctioned athletic competition or intercollegiate athletic event, or seventy-two hours after entering into this contract. Do not sign this contract until you have read it and filled in any blank spaces. Under Ohio law, as a student athlete signing this contract, you have the right to rescind this contract for a period of up to ten days after the latest of the following occurrences: (a) The date the contract is signed; (b) The date the athletic director or person of similar position at the educational institution or institution of higher education in which you are enrolled, or have acknowledged plans to attend, receives notice of this contract; or (c) The last date you participate in an officially sanctioned athletic competition or intercollegiate athletic event if no notice of this contract is provided to the athletic director or person of similar position. Despite cancellation of this contract, the educational institution, institution of higher education, or intercollegiate athletic association or conference to which your institution of higher education belongs may not restore your eligibility to participate in amateur or intercollegiate athletics. If you sign this contract prior to the last officially sanctioned athletic competition or intercollegiate athletic event you participate in and fail to notify your institution of this contract, your athletic team may be required to forfeit all games in which you participated after signing. Such action also may cause your athletic team to be declared ineligible for post-season play." (4) The athlete agent agrees in the agent contract to provide written notice of the agent contract to the athletic director or person of similar position at the educational institution or institution of higher education in which the athlete is enrolled prior to the earlier of the time the athlete next participates in or practices for an officially sanctioned athletic competition or intercollegiate athletic event after entering that agent contract, or seventy-two hours after entering that agent contract. (5) All terms and conditions contained in the agent contract comply with state and federal law. (B) A provision in an agent contract that provides for the resolution of any controversy in connection with the contract by arbitration is void and unenforceable unless both of the following apply: (1) The provision is contained in an agent contract between an athlete agent and an athlete for whom the athlete agent undertakes to secure employment. (2) The provision is included in the agent contract pursuant to a rule, regulation, or contract of a bona fide labor union or organization that regulates the relations of its members with athlete agents. (C) An athlete and athlete agent who enter an agent contract each shall provide written notice of that agent contract to the athletic director or person of similar position at the educational institution or institution of higher education in which the athlete is enrolled prior to the earlier of the time the athlete next participates in or practices for an officially sanctioned athletic competition or intercollegiate athletic event after entering that agent contract, or seventy-two hours after entering that agent contract. Sec. 4771.05. (A) The Ohio athletic commission, established administrator of athletics, appointed under section 3773.33 of the Revised Code, shall do all of the following: (A)(1) Review the application form of an applicant for registration as an athlete agent; (B)(2) Issue and renew biennial certificates of registration for an athlete agent pursuant to this chapter; (C)(3) Maintain records of every athlete agent registered in this state, including the agent's business and residential address, and the date and number of the agent's registration; (D)(B) The Ohio athletic commission, established under section 3773.33 of the Revised Code, shall do both of the following: (1) Establish an application form to be completed by an individual seeking registration as an athlete agent; (E) Establish a fee for the registration, and renewal of the registration, of an individual as an athlete agent in an amount necessary to generate sufficient funds to cover the cost of administering and enforcing this chapter; (F) (2) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Sec. 4771.07. (A) Each individual who desires to serve as an athlete agent within this state shall first file an application for registration with the Ohio athletic commissionadministrator of athletics. The applicant shall apply using a form prescribed by the Ohio athletic commission and shall provide all the following information: (1) The name and residential address of the applicant; (2) The address of the primary location in which the applicant wishes to conduct business as an athlete agent; (3) The type of business conducted or the occupation held by the applicant during the five years immediately preceding application; (4) The location and evidence of a trust fund established in accordance with division (B) of section 4771.12 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the commission; (5) The name and address of all persons who have a financial interest in the business operation of the applicant, or who are compensated for the solicitation or recruitment of athletes on behalf of the applicant, except for salaried employees who receive no commission or bonus pursuant to any agent or professional sports services contract; (6) Any other information deemed necessary by the commission. (B) The applicant shall submit with the application for registration an affidavit or certificate of completion describing all formal training or practical experience completed by the applicant in any of the following areas: (1) Contracts; (2) Contract negotiations; (3) Complaint resolution; (4) Arbitration; (5) Dispute resolution. An attorney admitted to practice law in this state shall submit with the application a certificate of good standing issued by the supreme court of Ohio in lieu of an affidavit or certificate otherwise required under this division. (C) An applicant shall submit with the application for registration an application fee in an amount determined by the commission pursuant to division (F) of section 4771.05 of the Revised Code of four hundred dollars and proof of one of the securities required under section 477.11 4771.11 of the Revised Code. (D) An athlete agent shall notify the commission administrator of any change in business location or address during the period of application for registration or during the period of time the registration of the athlete agent is valid. Sec. 4771.08. (A) Upon receipt of all the materials required for application for registration under section 4771.07 of the Revised Code, the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics shall evaluate the information provided and issue a certificate of registration to the applicant, unless the commission administrator finds that the applicant or an employee or representative of the applicant has committed any of the acts described in division (A) of section 4771.18 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the requirements for a certificate of registration under this chapter, the commission administrator shall issue a certificate of registration in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant is registered in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as an athlete agent in a state that does not issue that certificate of registration. (B) The commission administrator may issue a temporary certificate of registration, effective for a period of up to ninety days after the issuance of the temporary registration, to a nonresident athlete agent who is registered as an athlete agent in another state, or to a person who has not submitted all the material required under section 4771.07 of the Revised Code, but who the commission administrator determines to have submitted sufficient material to warrant the issuance of a temporary certificate. Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code does not apply to a temporary certificate of registration issued under this division. (C) The registration of an athlete agent with the commission is valid for a period of two years after the date the certificate of registration is issued. An athlete agent shall file an application for the renewal of a registration with the commission administrator at least thirty days prior to the expiration of the registration of the athlete agent. An application for renewal shall be accompanied by a renewal fee in an amount determined by the commission pursuant to division (F) of section 4771.05 of the Revised Codeof four hundred dollars. (D) Each certificate of registration issued by the commission administrator to an athlete agent shall contain all the following information: (1) The name of the athlete agent; (2) The address of the primary location in which the athlete agent is authorized to conduct business as an athlete agent; (3) A registration number for the athlete agent and the date of issuance of the registration. (E) No registration or certificate of registration is valid for any individual other than the athlete agent to whom it is issued. (F) The Ohio athletic commission is and the administrator are not liable for the acts of an athlete agent who is registered with the commissionunder this section. Sec. 4771.09. (A) The Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics may issue an eligible person a certificate of convenience to conduct business as an athlete agent when a registered athlete agent is deceased, or declared incompetent or physically infirm by the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. The commission administrator may issue a certificate of convenience upon either receiving approval to do so from a probate court or finding that the last will and testament of the athlete agent specifically authorizes the executor or administrator of estate to conduct the business of the athlete agent. (B) The following persons are eligible to obtain a certificate of convenience to conduct business on behalf of an athlete agent: (1) The executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased athlete agent; (2) The guardian of the estate of an athlete agent who has been declared incompetent or the conservator appointed to manage the estate of an athlete agent who has been declared physically infirm. (C) A certificate of convenience is valid for ninety days after the date it is issued. If the holder of a certificate of convenience applies for registration as an athlete agent, the commission administrator may renew the certificate of convenience for a period of time the commission administrator finds appropriate pending the commission's administrator's determination whether to issue a certificate of registration as an athlete agent to the holder of the certificate of convenience. Sec. 4771.10. The Ohio athletic commission may require each registered athlete agent to complete not more than six hours of continuing education during a biennial registration in programs to be determined or approved by the commission. If the commission imposes continuing education requirements on athlete agents, not less than two of the six hours of continuing education shall be devoted to ethics. A continuing education program shall promote the ability of an athlete agent to serve as an athlete agent in an ethical and legal manner. A continuing education program may address laws and rules governing athlete agents and rules and policies established by an athletic conference or a collegiate athletic organization. An athlete agent also may obtain credit for continuing education by participating in or attending lectures, courses at institutions of higher education, seminars, or rule-making or disciplinary proceedings approved by the commission, or by teaching a subject that pertains to the profession of an athlete agent. If the commission requires athlete agents to fulfill continuing education requirements under this section, the commission shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section. The rules shall contain procedures by which the commission or the administrator of athletics shall monitor an athlete agent's compliance with the continuing education requirements prior to renewal of an athlete agent's certificate of registration. Sec. 4771.11. (A) Prior to issuing a certificate of registration, the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics shall require an athlete agent to submit proof of one of the following securities: (1) A surety bond in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars in favor of the state of Ohio for the benefit of any person who is injured by a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; (2) A certificate of deposit in favor of, or a savings account assigned to, the state of Ohio for the benefit of any person that is injured by a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars; (3) Certification from an insurance carrier indicating that the athlete agent has obtained professional malpractice insurance in an amount equal to, or greater than, fifty thousand dollars, or a lesser amount, as permitted by the commissionadministrator. An athlete agent shall present evidence of a bond, a certificate of deposit, an assigned savings account, or professional malpractice insurance in the manner prescribed by the Ohio athletic commission. (B) The commission administrator shall hold on deposit, as an agent of the state, any surety bond or other form of security deposited with the commission administrator by an athlete agent. The commission administrator shall hold the security in trust contingent on an athlete agent's compliance with all provisions of this chapter including the payment of all moneys owed to an athlete, group of athletes, educational institution, or institution of higher education, and the payment of all damages other than punitive damages due as the result of a misstatement, misrepresentation, fraudulent act, deceit, or unlawful or negligent act or omission by an athlete agent in the course of serving as an athlete agent, or by a representative or employee of an athlete agent when the representative or employee acted within the scope of the representative's or employee's authority. The commission administrator may use funds held on deposit for an athlete agent to pay debts owed by an athlete agent as described in this division pursuant to a court or administrative order specifying the obligation of the athlete agent. (C) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability of an athlete agent to the amount of the surety bond, malpractice coverage, or other security held on deposit by the commissionadministrator. (D) An athlete agent shall maintain the security required under this section. If an athlete agent fails to maintain the security as required under this section, the commission administrator shall suspend the registration of the athlete agent until the athlete agent provides evidence of the bond, certificate of deposit, assigned savings account, or professional malpractice insurance, as required under this section. (E) The liability of the surety on a bond described in division (A) of this section shall not exceed the sum of fifteen thousand dollars in the aggregate for all persons who are injured by any and all violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. (F) A surety may cancel a bond described in division (A) of this section after mailing a written notice to the athlete agent and the commission administrator stating that the bond cancels sixty days after that notice is mailed. The liability of the surety for acts of the athlete agent continues during that sixty-day period. The cancellation notice does not absolve the surety from liability that accrues before the cancellation date but that is discovered after that date. (G) The commission administrator shall return the surety bond or other form of security held by the commission administrator under this section to the athlete agent submitting the bond or security, two years after the person ceases to serve as an athlete agent in this state. Sec. 4771.12. (A) Fees charged by an athlete agent for services provided to an athlete may be negotiated between the parties. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, an athlete agent shall establish an interest-bearing trust fund or similar account in a depository approved by the Ohio athletic commission to be used for the deposit of all revenues received on behalf of an athlete. An athlete agent shall deposit any revenue received on behalf of an athlete in the interest-bearing trust fund or account. The athlete agent shall notify the commission administrator of athletics of the address and location of the trust fund or account and the depository in which it is located. (2) An athlete agent who is an attorney licensed to practice law in this state may deposit any revenue received on behalf of an athlete in a trust account already maintained by the agent attorney in a financial institution in this state for the deposit of revenue received on behalf of clients. (C) No athlete agent shall share fees with any person other than an employee of the athlete agent. If an athlete agent shares a fee with an employee, the athlete agent shall obtain written consent from the athlete prior to entering a fee agreement with the athlete. No athlete agent shall enter fee agreements that are prohibited under this chapter. (D) If an athlete agent collects a fee or expense from an athlete as consideration for obtaining employment for the athlete, and the athlete agent fails to procure such employment, the agent shall retain only the following portion of the fee or expense: (1) The cost of reasonable expenses incurred by the athlete agent during the course of representing the athlete in efforts to obtain employment for the athlete; (2) A negotiated fee in connection with instances where the athlete receives a bonus or some compensation for signing a professional sports services contract. (E) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Ohio supreme court to establish or regulate fees for activities considered to be the practice of law. Sec. 4771.13. No athlete agent shall act on behalf of an athlete as a "dealer" or "investment advisor," as defined in section 1707.01 of the Revised Code, unless the athlete agent complies with Chapter 1707. of the Revised Code. An athlete agent shall disclose to an athlete and the Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics any ownership interest the athlete agent has in an entity referred to by the athlete agent in advising the athlete concerning investments. An athlete agent shall disclose any commissions or fees the athlete agent may receive as a result of an investment decision made by an athlete in response to investment advice from the athlete agent. Sec. 4771.14. (A) An athlete agent shall maintain all of the following records: (1) The name and address of each athlete for whom the athlete agent performs services as an athlete agent in exchange for compensation; (2) The amount of fees or compensation received for the performance of services for each athlete; (3) A copy of the contract entered into between the athlete agent and each athlete; (4) Any other information the Ohio athletic commission or the administrator of athletics finds appropriate in connection with the provision of services by an athlete agent. (B) An athlete agent shall maintain all records required to be maintained pursuant to this section, in a manner that the commission shall prescribe, for a period of five years. (C) No athlete agent or employee or representative of an athlete agent shall make, or cause to be made, any false records or records containing false information. (D) All financial records, financial books, and other records not subject to the attorney-client privilege that are required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter shall be open to inspection by the commission, the administrator, and its their representatives, upon reasonable notice, at the pleasure of the commission or the administrator. Sec. 4771.16. No athlete agent shall publish or cause to be published any false, fraudulent, or misleading notice, advertisement, or information with knowledge that it is false, fraudulent, or misleading. All advertisements of an athlete agent shall contain the name and registered business address of the athlete agent and some indication that the athlete agent is registered with the Ohio athletic commissionunder this chapter. As used in this section, "advertisement" includes circulars, signs, newspaper or magazine publications, or other oral or written communication that names the athlete agent in connection with the provision of services as an athlete agent. Sec. 4771.18. (A) The Ohio athletic commission administrator of athletics may, except as provided in division (B) of this section, refuse to grant or renew a registration, or and the Ohio athletic commission may suspend or revoke a registration of an athlete agent, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, upon proof satisfactory to the administrator or the commission that the athlete agent or an employee or representative of the athlete agent has done any of the following: (1) Made false or misleading statements of a material nature in an application for registration as an athlete agent; (2) Been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense in connection with the person's service as an athlete agent in this or another state; (3) Been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense involving illegal gambling; (4) Engaged in conduct that has a significant adverse impact on the applicant's credibility, integrity, or competence to serve in a fiduciary capacity; (5) Misappropriated funds or engaged in other specific conduct that would render the applicant unfit to serve in a fiduciary capacity, including being convicted of or pleading guilty to offenses involving embezzlement, theft, or fraud; (6) Violated a provision of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. (B) The commission administrator shall not refuse to issue a registration to an applicant because of a conviction of or plea of guilty to an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (C) Upon receiving a complaint of a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under it, the commission shall conduct an investigation of the complaint. If the commission finds reasonable cause to believe a violation occurred, the commission shall conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine if a violation occurred. If the commission finds a violation occurred, the commission may suspend or revoke, or the administrator may refuse to issue or renew, the registration of an athlete agent for such period of time as the commission or administrator finds appropriate. Upon completion of an investigation, if the commission finds no reasonable grounds to believe a violation occurred, the commission shall certify without a hearing that no violation occurred. The commission shall serve the certification on all parties addressed in the complaint by certified mail, return receipt requested. The certification shall be considered a final resolution of the matter if no objection to the certification is filed. A party involved in the complaint may file an objection to the certification with the commission within ten days after the date the certification is mailed. If a party files an objection to the certification within the prescribed period, the commission, within its discretion, may conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine if a violation occurred. Sec. 4771.21. Any person who conducts business in this state as an athlete agent consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state, whether or not the person is registered as an athlete agent with the Ohio athletic commissionunder this chapter. If an athlete agent conducts business in this state and thereafter leaves this state with intent to defraud creditors or to avoid service of process in an action brought under this chapter, the athlete agent thereby makes the secretary of state of the state of Ohio the agent of the athlete agent for purposes of service of process in any civil action or proceeding instituted in the courts of this state against the athlete agent arising out of, or by reason of, the athlete agent's conduct within this state. This appointment is irrevocable. The process shall be served by the officer to whom the process is directed or by the sheriff of Franklin county. The process shall be served as follows: (A) Upon the secretary of state by leaving the process and a true and attested copy of the process at the office of the secretary of state, at least fifteen days before the return day of the process; and (B) By sending to the defendant, at the defendant's last known address, by registered mail, postage prepaid, a like true and attested copy of the process, with an indorsement on the process of the service upon the secretary of state. The registered mail return receipt of the defendant shall be attached to and made a part of the return of service of the process. Sec. 4771.22. The Ohio athletic commission and the administrator of athletics shall deposit all money it receives they receive under this chapter to the credit of the occupational licensing and regulatory fund, created under section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4771.23. The Ohio athletic commission and the administrator of athletics shall comply with section 4776.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4774.03. (A) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, an individual seeking a license to practice as a radiologist assistant shall file with the state medical board a written application on a form prescribed and supplied by the board. The application shall include all the information the board considers necessary to process the application, including evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant meets the requirements specified in division (B) of this section. At the time an application is submitted, the applicant shall pay the board the application a fee specified by the board in rules adopted under section 4774.11 of the Revised Codeone hundred dollars. No part of the fee shall be returned. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, to be eligible to receive a license to practice as a radiologist assistant, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements: (1) Be at least eighteen years of age; (2) Hold a current, valid license as a radiographer under Chapter 4773. of the Revised Code; (3) Have attained a baccalaureate degree or postbaccalaureate certificate from an advanced academic program encompassing a nationally recognized radiologist assistant curriculum that includes a radiologist-directed clinical preceptorship; (4) Hold current certification as a registered radiologist assistant from the American registry of radiologic technologists and have attained the certification by meeting the standard certification requirements established by the registry, including the registry's requirements for documenting clinical education in the form of a clinical portfolio and passing an examination to determine competence to practice; (5) Hold current certification in advanced cardiac life support. (C) The board shall review all applications received under this section. Not later than sixty days after receiving an application the board considers to be complete, the board shall determine whether the applicant meets the requirements to receive a license to practice as a radiologist assistant. (D) The board shall issue a license to practice as a radiologist assistant in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a radiologist assistant in a state that does not issue that license. Sec. 4774.06. (A) An individual seeking to renew a license to practice as a radiologist assistant shall, on or before the license's expiration date, apply to the state medical board for renewal. The board shall provide renewal notices to license holders at least one month prior to the expiration date. Renewal applications shall be submitted to the board in a manner prescribed by the board. Each application shall be accompanied by a biennial renewal fee specified by the board in rules adopted under section 4774.11 of the Revised Codeone hundred dollars. The applicant shall report any criminal offense that constitutes grounds for refusing to issue a license under section 4774.13 of the Revised Code to which the applicant has pleaded guilty, of which the applicant has been found guilty, or for which the applicant has been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction, since last signing an application for a license to practice as a radiologist assistant. (B) To be eligible for renewal, a radiologist assistant shall certify to the board that the assistant has maintained both of the following: (1) A license as a radiographer under Chapter 4773. of the Revised Code; (2) Certification as a registered radiologist assistant from the American registry of radiologic technologists by meeting the registry's requirements for annual registration, including completion of the continuing education requirements established by the registry. (C) If an applicant submits a renewal application that the board considers to be complete and qualifies for renewal pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall issue to the applicant a renewed license to practice as a radiologist assistant. (D) A license that is not renewed on or before its expiration date is automatically suspended on its expiration date, subject to the provisions of section 119.06 of the Revised Code specifying that an applicant who appropriately files a renewal application is not required to discontinue practicing merely because the board has failed to act on the application. If a license has been suspended pursuant to this division for two years or less, the board shall reinstate the license upon an applicant's submission of a renewal application, the biennial renewal fee, and the applicable monetary penalty. The penalty for reinstatement is twenty-five dollars. If a license has been suspended pursuant to this division for more than two years, it may be restored. Subject to section 4774.061 of the Revised Code, the board may restore the license upon an applicant's submission of a restoration application, the biennial renewal fee, and the applicable monetary penalty and compliance with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. The board shall not restore a license unless the board, in its discretion, decides that the results of the criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible for a certificate issued pursuant to section 4774.04 of the Revised Code. The penalty for restoration is fifty dollars. Sec. 4774.11. (A) The state medical board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement and administer this chapter. In adopting the rules, the board shall take into consideration the guidelines adopted by the American college of radiology, the American society of radiologic technologists, and the American registry of radiologic technologists. (B) The rules adopted under this section shall include all of the following: (1) Standards and procedures for issuing and renewing licenses to practice as a radiologist assistant; (2) Application fees for an initial or renewed license; (3) Any additional radiologic procedures that radiologist assistants may perform pursuant to division (A)(5) of section 4774.08 of the Revised Code and the level of supervision that the supervising radiologist is required to provide pursuant to section 4774.10 of the Revised Code; (4)(3) Definitions of "general anesthesia," "deep sedation," "moderate sedation, "and "minimal sedation"; (5)(4) Any other standards and procedures the board considers necessary to govern the practice of radiologist assistants, the supervisory relationship between radiologist assistants and supervising radiologists, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter. Section 2. That existing sections 101.63, 103.27, 1531.40, 1533.631, 1533.72, 1561.11, 1561.13, 1561.15, 1561.23, 1561.26, 1563.24, 1565.04, 1565.05, 1565.06, 3319.2213, 3319.51, 3701.83, 3704.14, 3748.01, 3748.04, 3748.11, 3748.13, 3748.16, 3773.31, 3773.33, 3773.34, 3773.35, 3773.36, 3773.37, 3773.38, 3773.39, 3773.40, 3773.41, 3773.42, 3773.421, 3773.43, 3773.45, 3773.51, 3773.52, 3773.53, 3773.54, 3773.55, 3773.56, 3773.57, 3773.59, 3776.05, 4730.10, 4730.14, 4731.294, 4759.08, 4764.05, 4764.08, 4771.02, 4771.05, 4771.07, 4771.08, 4771.09, 4771.10, 4771.11, 4771.12, 4771.13, 4771.14, 4771.16, 4771.18, 4771.21, 4771.22, 4771.23, 4774.03, 4774.06, and 4774.11 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 1561.17, 3748.12, and 3748.121 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. (A) For the purposes of this section, "occupational licensing board" has the same meaning as in section 101.62 of the Revised Code. (B) Pursuant to division (E) of section 101.62 of the Revised Code, the following occupational licensing boards are hereby renewed and, subject to the revisions prescribed by this act, the statutes creating, empowering, governing, and regulating those boards are continued: (1) The Ohio Athletic Commission created under section 3773.33 of the Revised Code; (2) The Ohio Construction Industry Licensing Board within the Department of Commerce created under section 4740.02 of the Revised Code; (3) The Historical Boilers Licensing Board within the Department of Commerce created under section 4104.33 of the Revised Code; (4) The Ohio Home Inspector Licensing Board within the Department of Commerce created under section 4764.04 of the Revised Code; (5) The Division of Securities within the Department of Commerce described in Chapter 1707. of the Revised Code; (6) The State Board of Education created under section 3301.01 of the Revised Code; (7) The Ohio Environmental Protection Agency created under section 121.02 of the Revised Code; (8) The Ohio Department of Health described in Chapter 3701. of the Revised Code; (9) The State Medical Board created under section 4731.01 of the Revised Code; (10) The Ohio Department of Natural Resources described in Chapter 1501. of the Revised Code. (C) The occupational licensing boards listed in this section shall be triggered to expire under division (B) of section 101.62 of the Revised Code at the end of the thirty-first day of December of the sixth year following enactment of this section. Section 5. (A) With respect to any business commenced but not completed by the Executive Director of the Ohio Athletic Commission on the effective date of this section, that business shall be completed by the Director of Commerce or the Administrator of Athletics in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by the Executive Director. (B) Wherever the Executive Director is referred to in any law, contract, or other document, the reference shall be deemed to refer to the Director or the Administrator. (C) On the effective date of this section, both of the following apply: (1) Subject to the lay-off provisions of sections 124.321 to 124.328 of the Revised Code, all of the Commission's employees are transferred to the Department of Commerce and retain their positions and all of the benefits accruing thereto. (2) All of the Commission's employment records, equipment, and assets shall be transferred to the Department. (D) Any action or proceeding pending on the effective date of this section shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Director or the Administrator. In all such actions and proceedings, the Director or Administrator, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. Section 6. Beginning on the effective date of this section, the number of regulatory restrictions permitted in this state pursuant to section 121.953 of the Revised Code shall be increased by the number of regulatory restrictions contained in rules adopted by the Ohio Athletic Commission that are in effect on the effective date of this section.